Welcome to ATX. Congrats to the City of Austin and folks at COTA for rising to the challenge and bringing F1to Texas. Enjoy our great city 
Great lunch with my good bud Doug Brinkley. One of America's foremost thinkers and writers. Always insightful. 
Thanks to all Veterans who have served or are serving our country. You are greatly appreciated. #happyveteransday 
Back in Austin and just layin' around...  
RIP Coach Royal 
Happy birthday ! 
truly an epic #fail 
Dear cycling websites - i suggest you contact to hear about the crazy shit we did at Plano East in the 80's. #sitehits 
Hell to the yes! 
Hangin' in there..  
LiveALOHA!  
Happy Halloween.  
Alive and well in Hawaii. 
So proud of what we’ve accomplished together: The 15 Defining Moments of LIVESTRONG:  #LIVESTRONG15 
Happy birthday ! #13 
Hanging w/ the team talking about next week's events and plans for 2013. Can't wait to see so many friends and supporters. 
 
What am I doing tonight? Hanging with my family, unaffected, and thinking about this.  #onward 
Heroes in combat and beyond:  #SemperFi 
I'm in 
coming! 
heck of a game and you guys won fair and square. not much else to say. 
that is badass. Good luck! 
day of or day after? Big difference! 
yes. Start 48-72 hrs in advance. Don't start the ride "behind" on hydration/nutrition. 
honestly? At first I was like, "what?" then I ended up loving it. And Grace & Isabelle didn't stop talking about for hours 
Powerful. #ChuckSTRONG.  
absolutely! Thanks to you all! 
Congrats to Team Livestrong for finishing 4th in the Molokai Hoe race - top Hawaiian team! See y'all in two weeks.  
and private planes that go direct.. 
nice!! 
congrats 
damn! Impressive!! 
Had a blast HalfFull today. Great course, very well organized, and tons of support. Thanks! 
no way!! 
Made it to Maryland with and Great to be here. 
Happy bday !! 
Good early am workout with the team. Now off to pack for the Half/Full tomorrow. Forecast looks brutal! #nosmuggler 
#4 
have check his dm's. 
everyday brother. 3 hr ride and 1 hr swim. 
check your dm's 
Congratulations on being nominated to the Rock n Roll HoF!!  
yikes! 
Congrats to my good friend and loyal supporter on being named President of 
you mean a stinger over the, uh, stinger? 
On the BoD call. Great to see this little company absolutely crushing it. Sting or be stung. 
Inspiring piece about in todays  #LiveSTRONG 
what's the forecast?!? 
Good work, Coach. Good job, kids. RT Today was our walk at school.  
Happy birthday 
Headed back 2 Austin now 2 celebrate with family/friends. There were days I never thought I'd see 2012. Blessed to be this side of the grass 
Had a great coupla days in Portland working with my great partners Awesome to see the show of support on #livestrongday. 16 yrs! 
cool! 
well, in the pool actually. A whopping 1600 yds. 
dude, throw some plates on there. 
Hey - wake up. We already hit the gym and done. 
I'm down for that 
thanks Jason! Great to see you today. 
Hey CD (yes, the compact disc) - happy 30th bday. Time flies. 
Photos by of via Proud of you, girl.  #LIVESTRONGDay 
i was def a little rusty. 
Taking off for #Portland to see our partners Thx #coronado for a great few days. Can't wait to return. Cc 
saw u out there. Thanks! 
And thanks for absolutely crushing that bike course. That was all I could handle. Congrats on a great race. 
Had a helluva good time in the today. Thx to all who came out and like always, a massive thanks to all the volunteers! 
In honor of the sports roots I've decided to rock the speedo, grape smuggler, banana hammock, etc for the whole race. #oldschool 
Headin to the start of Oldest triathlon in America. Gonna be fun. 
Whoa. Wait. Which one was it?!? 
def crossed my mind 
I suspect he was doing exactly what I did. 
ha! 
nah. Get the boot or the sock. 
still got it! 
hang in there Will. Pulling for you. 
Had an absolute blast running the #grassroutesfest this AM. This old dog suffered in the collegiate race.. Congrats on the win! 
Last CC meet I did in 1989. Thx for fwd'ing. Cc  
cool. I look fwd to the debates 
I disagree 
absolutely! 
Great spending time with today. Amazing man with an even more amazing story. 
I'm at with so, no. Raincheck. 
hey, who's our 5th? People are worried one of y'all has 3 or 4 pelotas. 
I knew someone would say it. The 5th dude is new to me. Haven't met him yet. 
the 8 
Running my first CC meet since high school tomorrow. Team "nueve pelotas" ready to rock. Me, L2,  
there's absolutely nothing wrong with that as far as I'm concerned. 
it was 2 things. A compliment to an amazing athlete and a real fear for some. Guess u missed it 
yessir. And yes, sticky! 
Great to have HRH Princess in Austin and at our home tonight. Dina, thanks for all your passion in the global cancer fight! 
Happy birthday !! 
I told jack he's losing his touch. 
did you see a guy suffering like a dog? Then, yes. 
that one hurt fellas 
I know exactly what you mean 
oh lord 
+1! 
correct! 
I completely agree 
Way cool swimming in the same lane with today. Until Coach Jane called for a 1000 IM. 
miss that town! 
no Pelley? 
We just launched a national campaign 2 promote FREE services 4 people affected by cancer:  Check it out 
Just ran an hour on the #greenbelt with and L2. Hot and humid. I reckon woman has a real shot in #kona 
And happy birthday to 
happy birthday !! 
Erik Webb is spot on 
we run as a group most Thursdays. Everyone welcome. 
Up early heading 2 Dallas for the "Swing Fore! Yellow". 4th annual. 4th straight sellout. Thanks to all our supporting golfers. #Livestrong 
go Lane!! 
congrats! 
absolutely. Best of luck. I'd love to pop in for a day or two. 
I'm in. 
en hora buena!!! 
you win 
that's a thing. 
hell no i didn't!! 
I dunno but the dude surely has some reach advantage. Anyhow, I'm a huge fan so no interest in a fight. 
stay tuned! 
ran 1:30 and change. wanted to break 1:30 but can't complain. nearly 2000 vert and a very technical course. 
i'm very grateful for the support. also glad to see registration is up 25% in just a matter of days.. 
absolutely! 
Had an absolute blast running the this morning. Stoked to get 4th place as well. #goldenleaf 
has he lost his mind? 
. Brad - Thank you for your service. Stay safe and hurry home. Best, Lance 
Smart, very smart.  
Hey – good luck to you and all the folks at 'Swim For Your Life' tomorrow. Thanks for your incredible support of 
learn to swim. get a bike. good luck! 
Love this.  
yessir 
Buenas Dias Durango! Having an early breakfast with and his lovely wife before the Ruta Durango-Mazatlan. 
congrats! 
hang in there dude. All of us are pulling for your mom 
Out previewing the course that's this Saturday. Looks like it lives up to its name!  
Can't wait to race w/ fellow survivors in the benefiting the on Oct. 7th.  #UCFYA 
Thx for all the bday wishes. Had a great day. Bike ride, 18 holes of golf, then a hard swim with #timeforacoldbeer 
Heading to Austin with for first football game of the season! Boys trip! 
doubtful 
So proud to be associated with 2012 Indy Car Champion Thanks for supporting my friend! 
Hey .. 17-7. 
indeed. I wasn't even in the same zip code. I'm cool with that. Congrats Cameron. 
And a big thanks to all the volunteers and staff for putting on a smooth event. 
Hit the Teocalli Tamale for a big ol' burrito on the way outta town. I swear it weighed 5 lbs. #delicious 
Fun day racing Alpine Odyssey today. I was one of the many who suffered out there I'm sure! 
racing this morning but around afterwards. Come on by - I'd love to meet her. 
what are u waiting on? Be somebody! 
Thanks to the fine folks at The Secret Stash here in CB for the amazing pizza tonight. 
thank you!! 
– Sorry to hear about your friend. Have the family contact for treatment options:  
Had a blast hosting big annual fundraiser at the house tonight. I miss the Governor. 
Psych! 
Hey - you bet. Happy to help. Call my cell 778 384 7520. Take care, L 
Made it back to #atx. Just ran 8 hard ones around Town Lake with Lance "L2" Parker. Damn, it's steamy out. 
not necessarily 
Congrats to 3 time cancer survivor Coach Jim Calhoun on his retirement today. 
Good to see it still rains in West Texas. 
Thanks to my good friend Ed Ruscha for donating this piece to the auction for 15 yr anniv gala. #imready  
heck yeah. Keep on keepin on 
I completely agree cc 
Excited to be racing / Alpine Odyssey this weekend in Crested Butte. 
Just landed in Marfa. Quite the contrast to New York City. 
go girl!!! 
Done with a day of great meetings here in #NYC with the crew. Great things happening. 
agreed. Stay tuned. 
bam! Love it. 
cool! Breaststrokers everywhere! 
we definitely will. So sorry to hear that. 
congrats!! 
congrats!! 
Congratulations on winning #lavuelta in impressive fashion. 
Had to dust off my speed concept. Getting ready for the end of the month.  
one of my all time favs. 
A little kick start for your Sunday morning.  
Great 15 mile run w/ Lance "L2" Parker. Town Lake was packed w/ runners - great to see. Fun seeing & others 
We're here for her  RT Can I get a RT for my mom who found out 2day that the fight isn't over? 
81 cents 
absolutely. We're pulling for him. #livestrong!! 
- tell your friend to contact Navigation Center. We help families come up with a plan/get organized 1-855-220-7777 
exercise! 
You can help other cancer survivors right now just by taking the Survivor Survey:  #shareyourstory 
Hard 10 mile BOMB run this AM w/ and I'm going back to bed now. 
good luck!! 
town lake trail. multiple distances/loops. or the greenbelt. but beware, it's HOT!! 
oh man, that hurt. 
good start. 
Just left meeting with Going over Fall plans. 
Had the honor of mtg these Seals at 05 tdf. Was in Coronado in 08 for hell week. Looking fwd to racing  
Hey - I am truly sorry we screwed you. Please forgive us.  
very cool, thank you. Tips? Stay ON the bike! And make sure to eat/drink enough. Appreciate the support! 
hell yeah it is 
today 1:15 
So wrong on so many levels.  
ha!! Actually, yes. 
uhhh... 
Remind me not to stay out til 2am w/ again. Hurtin' for certain today. 
So cool to see win again today! Thanks for supporting in so many ways! 
Finally? Seriously? 
thanks to the kids at Van Buren Elem for the support! 
Great 60 min trail run on the Greenbelt w/ and Ryan from 
Thinking about my friend and fellow survivor this morning. Hang in there and keep livin' strong! 
happy bday and wish her my best! 
Back in Austin from Montreal and the World #CancerCongress. Now back to my day job - being a chauffeur for my kids. 
A video message about our road ahead:  #LIVESTRONG 
Enter to win a Madone from Team and  
nah, never. 
Salut Montreal - Merci/Thanks for the run!! I had a blast. #CancerCongress #fth 
amen to that brother 
Honored to address the global cancer community this morning at the UICC World Cancer Congress. #CancerCongress #progress #livestrong 
I hope your surgery went well today You are an inspiring young woman battling with a great attitude. #livestrong 
Merci/thanks! 
Hey Montreal - anyone want to run tomorrow? Meet me at the Monument to Sir George - Etiene Cartier. 6pm! 7.5km loop.  
Salut Montreal - quelqu'un veut courir a pied demain? Rendez-vous au monument pour Sir George-Etienne Cartier. 6pm. Circuit de 7.5kms. 
Thinking of Former and his family today as he fights his third cancer diagnosis. #FightLikeHell #LIVESTRONG 
asking me today, I'd agree. 
Can't wait 2 see so many friends & partners in Montreal is honored 2 be a part of the #CancerCongress 
First run back in Austin. Ran 10 and thought I was gonna cook. #welcomebacktotheheatandhumidity 
Heading back to Austin, TX with and First day of school tomorrow! 
Had a blast racing the #poweroffour this morning. Got whooped up on by a kid young enough to be my son! Keegan Swirbul - remember that name! 
much appreciated! 
absolutely. Plus a full trail marathon on Sunday. You in!? 
that's right Steve. Full attention from this day on. Lots of work to do. 
Got my new Superfly ready for tomorrow's #poweroffour.  
high five! 
thanks bill. As will I. 
thank you. We love it here. 
she is in my/our thoughts. F cancer. 
Thanks to all the amazing supporters worldwide. Donations today were UP 25x over yesterdays. Thank you thank you thank you! 
heck yeah. onward and upward. 
Then for the heck of it, here's what Sunday looks like.  
Excited to be racing the #poweroffour tomorrow here in 9000 vert in just 36 miles!  
My official statement re: pitiful charade  
does playing 18 holes count? 
I like the double double at the Ajax Tavern 
Happy birthday and ! 
yes 
don't do that. is a good man. Onward. 
ha. No my dear. Just a run. 
Ain't life funny. Last night I was swearing I'd never do again what I did yesterday. Now today I can't wait to do it again. 
hell yeah! And dude, btw, great name. 
on my way 
I don't think I'll ever don't again. It was that hard. 
great advice. 
5:40. I blew big time. Not fun. 
I was running! 
counter 
Survived Four Pass Loop. Barely. Lordy Lordy. #chasingrickey 
Up and at 'em early here in Running the Four Pass loop w/ and Gonna b long (27ish) and hard (8000 vert) !! 
Please RT and will donate $0.25 to when you tweet hashtag #LivestrongCard till 8/31.  
Thinking about tonight. Your family is the reason we fight so hard against this terrible disease. #LIVESTRONG 
Good luck to this week. We're behind you, man. #FightLikeHell 
I'm on it! 
Back in after a great #LSCPhilly wknd. Thx to you all who came out and a special thx to all our great volunteers!! 
thanks Team Romano! 
Came up on a guy riding a pink beach cruiser in today's #LSCPhilly. Then I realized it was  
I'm in 
hahaha! 
Hey - congrats!! 
100 
Thanks for sharing your family's story tonight. #strength #LSCPhilly 
Psyched to be in Philly for the #LSCPhilly. Another year here and another record turn out. Thanks to the Army for all u do! 
booya! 
hang in there and please let us know if/how/when we can help. 
awesome!! Thanks for being there! 
correct 
very cool. They are great people. Cc 
Happy Birthday ! 
Thanks for the good run this AM. Upper Lost Man around to Lower Lost Man. 
whens the last time you fucking idiots did anything for anyone else? Fuck off! 
tough call. They're different. Both harder than a dead dingos donger. 
awesome!! Thank you so much. 
Alright, sign me up for this!  
Quote of the day.  
Watched last night. Absolutely chilling. Don't miss it. 
thanks hombre. missed you there. tough day on the trail. 
Thanks Kevin, Paul, Roger, Peter and everyone who made such a success this wknd. We are proud to be partners! 
heck yeah girl. congrats! 
you bet. proud of those kids. 
it's coming to the violet crown soon i hear 
got myself a W 
i'm doing fine w/ one. 
On my drive to #Steamboat (there and back) I couldn't stop listening to the soundtrack. Incredible music and an even better story 
Had a blast today. Great course and beautiful day. Thanks to and the volunteers for giving up their Sunday. 
when I die 
thanks girl! 
Heading to #steamboat for the Running the marathon tomorrow. Gonna be some suffering! 
coupla great dudes. We can't wait to return to the big island. Be there soon. 
Happy birthday to survivor extraordinaire ! 
Thanks for a good/hard (for me) trail run. Hunter creek, Iowa, lollipop, smuggler. 
Every min this man is denied coverage of a lifesaving care is a travesty. Watch and RT:  #FightLIkeHell 
thank you! 
Stopped by the #LT100 pre-race briefing to wish all the riders good luck and safe racing. Gr8 to see Ken, and Miralee. 
good luck Ryan. Pulling for you. 
Had dinner tonight with his family, and a few others. Always great to catch up with the good doc on so many topics. 
no worries dude. hope you're well. 
I donated a TdF bib # for 's auction benefiting the Pikes Peak Red Cross. Hosted by  
for the most part I actually agree 
Congrats to on the silver in London today. #GOTREYHARDEE 
that's for sure. And you're paying for the dysfunction. 
Happy birthday ! 
no doubt 
I normally do the 100 so will prob do again. You? 
Challenging everyone to a run AND a ride in Philly Aug 18-19. Who's with me?  #LSCPhilly 
My bud (and supporter) representing! Check it.  
go back & read your tweets. You said I was jealous of "young" athletes who compete in "intense" events. That's nonsense/clueless 
nor any clue about 
just hiked up another one 
are you serious? 
we are psyched about the new store. when is the opening? 
You bet there is. RT there is life after Cancer. Thank you Lance and Dr Craig Nichols. 
I'm sitting in my living room (in Colorado) reading the paper so wasn't me! 
heck yeah 
Almost home  
Headed toward Conundrum Hot Springs  
Descending Triangle Pass. Almost 13,000 ft  
Top of Triangle Pass  
On our way to Triangle Pass  
#2. Me and getting after it.  
Some shots from our run today courtesy of And yes, Teddy was running too!  
Oops, meant "back". 
thanks for getting my bike dude 
never. And according to some I've never "won" anything. 
Early AM wake up. Runnin East Maroon-Conundrum (23ish miles) w/ If i don't return tell my kids I love 'em. you in? 
heck yeah they are. they loved it. 
skip's a f'ing clown. 
Get well soon coach Calhoun.  
if he was a cyclist they'd already have him convicted for this. 
congrats dude. 
if you agree to play nice 
Definitely HZJ. You are definitely not EZ which, btw, is a good thing. 
Sad news in the #Austin #tri community. Please come out and show support for the family tomorrow AM. Info here:  
i'm a fan 
Thinking of as she preps for surgery. We love you girl. #LIVESTRONG 
Nice! RT a permanent reminder for me of that exact sentiment:  
15 mile trail run with today. Fun watching the old man suffer like a dog. 
Happy birthday to board member and longtime friend Have a great day Mitch. 
Congratulations to on winning Olympic gold in the women's TT. Outstanding!! 
yes 
Rode my 500 EXC over to Crested Butte with and Roman. Had some insane pizza at the Secret Stash. Highly recommended. 
negative 
Back 2 Just ran w/ - Author of All In: The Education of Gen David Petraeus. Talkin Petraeus, and 
Up at the crack with picking up from summer camp. Miss em. 
hang in there. we're all pulling for you. 
had to be a look alike 
that AIN'T the place for guacamole! 
yep. safe bet. watch boonen, goss, greipel, and sagan tho. assuming anyone can stay on Wiggins' wheel in the leadout. 
oh, I saw it. what a clown. can sure pick em. 
no sir/maam. picking up my kids at summer camp and they have no interest in a bike race big or small. keep me posted. 
In Austin for 2 days. Just went out and ran for 45 mins in the middle of the day. Holy shit, huge mistake. #hotterthandonutgrease 
as long as you're the one doing the damage then it's all good. Go 
Good luck to #Olympic Swimmer, #cancer survivor and Global Envoy Eric this Sunday! #USA 
500 EXC's. 
mix of both. Mostly dirt. 
doubtful. 2013 tho. 
Made it back to (in one piece). Loved hanging in Thanks to all the locals for the great hospitality. Be back soon! 
Incredible sunset.  
So much for the "bear proof" trash bin.  
doh 
oh, I'm sorry. Someone asked a question and I answered. Is it only polite when it's the answer you wanna here? 
Made it to 202 miles.  
One man down. "Frenchy" broke his leg coming down from Star Pass. Sucks!!  
Up early. Heading offroad from to w/ some buds. Pics to follow. Thanks to and for the support! 
Incredible day here in with Great ride up to Ashcroft and the Bells with a passionate group of supporters. 
no 
Congrats to on his historic Tour de France victory. Very impressive. 
Proud of #RAGBRAI riders. Raised $210K this year for programs. Have fun. Old team photo:  
very cool 
dude, i didn't tell you i started 2 secs back of y'all. AND i knew where the start line was. anyhow, way to hammer. 
Congrats to for going 1-2-3 today in Cascade. Great kids w/ great talent. cc 
Great 4 hr mtb ride today w/ and today. i just love getting my ass kicked by 20 yr olds. 
where is she? 
My girl new travel show premieres today online. You can check it out here
 
13 mile trail run done. Smuggler, Iowa, up the plunge, overlook, hobbit, down hunter creek. Ouch. 
Thank you ACI for hosting the Championship this weekend benefiting -  #ACCGolf 
i heard from Robb last night. I will reach out today. Thinking of Andreas. 
a descender? 
Redesigned brake caliper mount.  
Even some love on there  
The Sarge getting my new Superfly SL dialed.  
Pumped to see all the #LSCPhilly alumni in 1 month. Make year 7 our biggest & best yet. I'll be there, will u? Join me!  
Thinking of Jack and the Hoeger family as they continue to face this terrible disease.  #FightLikeHell 
Great dinner tonight with Good discussion about sports in general, and the #TdF. 
Have Cancer? Have Kids? Send em 2 a funded program, 30 free camps this summer #CommunityImpact  
speechless. 
Glad sports cartoonist agrees with the witch hunt mentality  
Congrats to the Caveman on his win at XTERRA Beaver Creek today. 
Had a tough 12 mile train run this AM. Tiehack, Govt, Tom Blake, Owl Creek, then the MCCC for a swim w/ the kiddos. 
If you are a cancer survivor pls take the survey today and help shape our programs and services.  
Congrats  
Happy 60th birthday to (AKA Dr. Craig Nichols). He helped save my life and inspired the start of in 1996! 
dude, I'm alive. Barely. Exhausted. 
Doing an epic mtb ride 2morrow w/ & others. 100 miles w/ plenty of climbing. need sleep! 
Good luck to tonight! Anyone tonight? 
So glad to see Dan is living strong!  #navigation 
Sheriff Bob - get well soon. We're all pulling for you. 
Congrats to the crew - Half way to AK. Follow them on twitter and check out the route:  
Let me be clear: the riders in question are also victims of unfair process and antics. #unconstitutional 
Wishing your family strength, Krista. RIP, Kathleen.  
This isn't about wanting to clean up cycling - rather it's just plain ol' selective prosecution that reeks of vendetta. 
...in exchange for immunity, anonymity, and the opportunity to continue to race the biggest event in cycling.. 
So let me get this straight...come in and tell exactly what they wanted to hear... 
. you're an inspiration to us all. 
RULES. Period. At least my daughter didn't sneak some Beiber on there. 
Congrats to the #SurvivorSummit team - All 17 made it up Kilimanjaro today.  
that is hilarious. I did. Wow. You can have it. Hope some of the music is of interest to you. 
Killer mtb ride w/ Aspen -Skyline Trail-Rim Trail-Snowmass-Village Bound-Cross Mtn-Government-Aspen. 
really? Hey, I hope you never need us but if you do, we're here. 24/7. 
stay tuned.. 
I refuse to be distracted by antics. It's 2012, I'm gonna continue to lead raise my 5 kids, and stay fit! 
Waking up here in the high mtns overlooking historic Woods Lake. Beautiful morning. 
is that why he plead guilty? #oops 
Wow. can pick em. Here's ( 1 of 3 Review Board members studying my case. #protectingcleanathletesandpervs 
Deeply saddened to hear about the passing of Jesse Richardson - our teammate. RIP Jesse. 
Check out the first 6 women to ride the TdF course, all for a good cause. 10% of sales go to  #revetour 
Congratulations to on making yet another #Olympic team! All of us are so proud of you! 
Another great spot with my friend 
 
dude, that's sick. That's what you get for being out of shape and cross eyed. 
thanks Andrew! 
Big thanks to all the riders at the Challenge Davis. We appreciate your support. #LSCDavis 
My response to heinous allegations.  
process being the key word. There is none. #unconstitutional 
not in front of the review board. Read again. Big difference. 
Tim Dockery nails it. Please read.  
Happy birthday to You are an inspiration:  #FightLikeHell 
Thank you very much. I plan on it. 
And yes, Michael Ashendon was on the UCI's Biological Passport "expert" panel in 2009. 
Came across 2 articles that contradict false claim that I doped n 09. Pls read.   
Congrats on winning the Baby Giro. Incredible!!! 
Congrats to #28 Global Envoy on his win at 
Until now there has been no response, not even an acknowledgement of receipt. The knife cuts both ways - it's time to play by the rules. 
Dear - we have now sent you THREE letters requesting all the relevant info in order for me to respond to your "review board". 
My official statement re: latest witch hunt.  #unconstitutional 
C 
yes 
Bidding now open for the #Kona Experience.  
Having a great lunch with Thor Hushovd and our families here in France. Good to catch up with him. #realbikerider 
Wishing my friend strength and courage for the days ahead. We’re pulling for you. #LIVESTRONG 
I completely agree. 
Congrats on one helluva career. Sad to see you go. 

Last long run before #IMFrance today. 20 miles along some of the most stunning scenery anywhere. Loved every step. 
good luck!! 
Flanders. 
as I'm surrounded by my 5 kids, feels ok. 10 would be a bit hectic. 
Congrats to on his win at Eagleman today. Tons of respect for this man - on and off the course. 
99% of all my rides are on my TT bike. Hence the reason i chose it actually. 
all depends on the pilot... 
Lots of folks wondering if I will choose a road or time trial bike. TT bike! Yet to decide on my wheel set up tho. 
6 hrs on the bike. Pre-rode the #IMFrance course then some. Course is HARD. Lots of climbing and very technical. 
Happy birthday ! 
Great swim this morning with Yves Cordier's tri club/Olympic Nice Natation. 3900 mts. 
Good little ride with today. Trying to shake off the jetlag. Tested out the new Madone. Pretty special I must say. 
great to hear from you my old dear friend. How's Catalunya? 
In Europe and up early following the voting on #prop29. Thanks to all involved in this campaign. #fingerscrossed 
CA, today you can vote to save lives. Here's why you should:  #YESon29 Thanks to & 
RIP Jane Frazier. lost a dear friend today. 
Headed Austin to Nice. Getting ready, and excited, for #IMFrance! 
it's actually a size bigger. 
sad news. please pass along my condolences. 
Happy birthday !! 
Thanks Doc! 
thank you! 
congrats dude! 
Thanks to my friend for letting me share my voice on this critical issue.  #yeson29 
did they ever stop? 
yes. Call Larry Einhorn. Good luck and Livestrong! 
thanks Merle! 
Thanks 2 all the volunteers 4 helping out today. I'd also like to thank the islands gods for turning on the 'pele' today. She was blowing!! 
Well, that was a TMFD. I'm cooked. pushed me hard!! Congrats to as well! 
Just spoke to who's at the race start. Could barely hear him tho. Wind is already howling and it's only 4:45am... 
bring it on 108 
U.S. fans, win a trip to see in Paris at the Tour! Check your cell phone upgrade eligibility  
I like it 
ANOTHER record month for Way to go team!! You are all amazing. 
ha! Busted us! 
Absolutely epic of paddling in the Olamau race. Love it!!  
he knows right where to find me. 
hilly? 
hmmm. I'd love to come down under and do some suffering. Always loved my trips there for TDU. 
thanks! 
Damn, the #Spurs are on fire. 
Just taped a segment w/ who's filling in for Talking and #yeson29! 
it's in Colorado. Will send when I get there. 
Thanks for the swim this am. Main set - 6x50's on 40 followed by a 300 at 85%. 3 times thru. 
I hope both & can agree that #YESON29 is the right vote! cc: #savelives 
Saturday here in Hawai'i. 
I'll be out for an easy spin at some point. Not sure when tho doc. GL in the race 
good luck 
i agree 
is it on tv? 
Back home and Iron Maiden live is on VH1 Classic. Day just keeps better and better. 
Spent my #MemorialDay running long. 21 miles. Trying to get myself ready for #IMFrance! 
Happy #MemorialDay to all of you. Thank you to all who have served our country past, present, and future. 
thank god for adjustable hoop heights. 
she should experience my driving in the snow. 
Weather took a turn. Another video from the bike  
100+ miles done. Hawi, Pololu Valley, back over the Kohalas, Waimea, and back. Had all kinds of weather. 
Video check in from Kona  
Congratulations to on his incredible victory in the #giro. Gotta love it when the best man wins. 
you mean you played 6 holes of golf like I'm about to do? 
yessir. better tell as well. 
Ran 10 this morning on Alii Dr. Finally feeling recovered from last wknd. Spotted/busted (!) checking out the surf too. 
heck yeah. Thank you for your service. Semper Fi! 
D! 
absolutely not. That is just another lie big tobacco is spewing. 
Great early morning swim with and out on the #IM course. I'd like to thank the dolphins and rays for joining too. 
fact 
nah, not bad. 
vote yes on ! 
congrats dude 
video recap of my web chat last week from their south Austin club
 
running consistently, running longer, and staying injury free (knock on wood) 

heck yeah. Go Mom. 
dude. Never forget. 
couldn't agree more. Stay tuned. 
Excellent review of my bud Doug Brinkley's new book #CRONKITE. Looks like not much has changed  
thank you for being there 
it was approx 22 yrs.. 
Glad to join to “Give Big Tobacco a Kick in the Ash and Save Lives"  #Yeson29 
Hectic 24 hrs. Back from FL, rip around w/ my 5 kids, unpack, (try to) sleep, drop kids at school, repack, now on our way to #Kona. 
. Thanks caveman! 
RIP Robin Gibb. Continues to sadden me to see cancer take our loved ones. Gotta put a stop to it. 
more sleep, better diet. 
thanks! off to Kona tomorrow...too bad y'all arent there to kick my butt in the pool 
Thanks to all the fans for coming out and, like always, thanks to all the VOLUNTEERS! Couldn't have races w/o you all. 
Helluva day here at #IM703FL. I felt pretty good I must say. Think I finally figured out the nutrition component which has been dogging me. 
I want a raise! 
Heading to the start of #IM703FL. For race updates - and 
Amazing ride by rider Not to be that one to say I called it in Gila but, yeah, I called it. 
thanks homegirl 
Go !! 
you bet. Don't be late next time. Haha. 
man, I hope you drive after than you respond to tweets!! 
sorry we're late!! 
Off to Haines City for Florida 70.3 Check out this #RoadtoKona made by available in US and Canada 
 
Gesink 
Congrats to for winning her division in the Congress Ave Mile! 
Good day to watch some cycling, tri, and running. Mt Baldy in the Tour of Cali, #IMTexas, and the Congress Ave Mile. 
absolutely. 100%. 
now that is funny. 
no 
the latter 
. you racing Nice?? 
Happy birthday ! 
yes 
Big Tobacco spending more than a Super PAC to defeat and cancer research  #Yeson29 
Excited to welcome to to sign copies of her new book "A Life Without Limits".  
they normally always do. I would have loved to have met the man. 
I'd love to however I am back in Austin, TX. Have a good ride. 
yes 
Rhonda rules 
So badass! Tom Sachs: NIKECraft  
Really enjoyed speaking this morning. Great audience. Now off to run 17. #juggling 
Thank you for your donation to the #Yeson29 campaign. He knows a few things about tobacco cessation.  
still 170's 
you bet. good to meet you. 
get well soon girl. 
Cigarette tax is a lifesaver  
looking for a good group. What ya got? 
you bet. Send us his email. Cc 
And we got Skynard on the sat radio. #allgood 
Me and on our way to Looking fwd to getting things kicked off in the AM. 
on our way 
Happy Mothers Day! 
Congratulations for getting that first big win of the year. #48 
Follow the LIVE with the Tour Tracker and FREE apps for Apple & Android  
Hey - good luck this wknd at Le Mans! 
And the tour continues. Just landed in the Bay Area. Taping new show shortly. #yeson29 
Great event at CHLA promoting Thanks and all our partners for coming out! #yeson29 
cool shot. The Caveman rules. 
fact 
dude, April fools day was a long time ago. Sorry to disappoint. 
Looking forward to meeting with at Children's Hospital of Los Angeles tomorrow and discussing #yeson29 
Thank you!! 
Another powerful and inspiring piece from  
joe, very sad indeed. I enjoyed meeting him. 
uh, zero 
Got myself a new Speed Concept with a cool new paint scheme.  
Hey - the dinosaurs are gone but you're still here so we're safe.  
you bet. Best of luck. Really enjoyed Monty's piece. 
Pulling for you - keep livin' strong! 
Talk about pelotas. Wow.  
RIP Bill Peterson. All of us in the cycling world will miss you greatly. 
great shot. Hope yalls race went well. 
4 yr anniv of the opening of Thanks to the best staff any bike shop has ever seen. And thx to all of our customers! 
Congrats and for going 1-2 on the Gila Monster today! 3rd overall and wins team GC. 
Hey - congrats! Another stellar win. Thx for not chic'ing me. 
And one big shout out/thank you to all the amazing volunteers. Races like this wouldn't be possible without you all. 
Thank you everyone here in St. Croix for supporting this event year after year. Glad to be back 24 yrs later. Beautiful spot you got here. 
My oh my, that was a doozy. Congrats to on his tremendous win. Homeboy ran like a gazelle. 
Also live coverage on  
For St Croix race updates, check out and 
if used properly 
dude! You didn't announce the results?? #asswhoopin 
Racing flats for tomorrow are ready.  
Congratulations on winning the prologue in the #Giro today. Incredible performance but not the least bit surprising. 
great shot brother. we're gonna miss him. 
we agree 
she "made" the salad 
stay upright 
still thinking 
Loving St Croix and her people. Dinner w/ Higs, and #stcroixjumpup 
So proud of the guys 3rd today and 5th. Keep it up fellas. 
Crushed to hear the news of Adam Yauch's passing. #RIPMCA 
Fun swim of the course here in St. Croix this morning. Good to finally meet out there. Asked him to take it easy on me Sunday. 
Thinking about while down here in St. Croix. Pulling for you my friend. 
please wish him my best. 
loved our visit. Thanks for everything. 
Thanks to UT for investing in the health of our community  #HealthyATX 
Just rode the bike course here in St. Croix.Dang, that $hit is for real. Hardly a flat section in it. Relentlessly undulating. 
right on! i'm stoked! 
like higs and i are doing riiiight now? 
oops. 
read it. got it. good to know. 
Congrats on a great first stage Listen up bike fans, want America's next great climber. Look no further. 
nope, Ryan Adams Radio is DJ'ing. 
must be a helluva look alike. 
we told Tom Guthrie we were coming. See you there. 
St Croix bound w/ and #beautyandthebeast 
Hey all you #F1 fans. Progress on the Austin track. Coming along.  
saving the big shave for October. 
because that is the "talking point" of big tobacco. Don't fall for it. #yeson29 
dude, i have way more hair than that. c'mon bro. 
cycling's biggest problem. 
jeg, quit tweeting from school! 
yes 
90+% 
may she RIP 
what's that? 
Had a fun ride with and this morning heading southeast. Riding with Kelly is a lot easier than running with her... 
Livestrong Vomeros. 
This is amazing.  
Happy birthday !!! 
Spending a little quality time with the fine folks from Surprise control - blood and urine. 
San Francisco Chronicle endorses  #Yeson29 
Nice! Thanks for coming out to support Bo and his efforts. 
Thanks Ethan!  
nice work TO. Athlete of the year so far (in my book). 
For those who occasionally complain about workout/training tweets. Fyi, I'm sitting on my ass drinking an ice cold beer. 
actually it was before breakfast. 
Good swim this morning w/ and 4500 yards. Tough wakeup after late arrival from #Buffalo. 
no doubt. Anything I can do to help then let me know. 
in 140 characters or less???? 
Had a blast speaking at Univ of Buffalo tonight. Great crowd and CLASSIC question and answer session. Thanks to you all! 
sorry! Or maybe I outta apologize to her folks?!? 
go for it 
thanks for the preview of what the room looks like. I was wondering. 
I am 
Trophy from #duelinthepool!  
Tough loss to at the first ever #Duelinthepool. Great cause! Seriously, you are a hero. Thank you. 
heck yeah. can't wait. been too long! coming down early to get ready. 
Can't be this close and not come check out Niagara Falls!  
Great 14 mile fartlek run along the Niagara River. Enjoyed the cooler temps. Thx for the run support. 
haha. hard to pick em up when i'm in #Buffalo. Tell 
hang in there Rica. We're here for ya and all pulling for you. 
.@Violettep Hey Jim, we're all pulling for you!!! Livestrong!! Lance 
are you doing this 15 miler w/ me tomorrow AM??? 
i'm going to bed early homegirl. i hope i can stay at least a body length of you tomorrow! 
i'm going to bed early homegirl. i hope i can stay at least a body length of you tomorrow! 
I see you man. For the record, hard to miss that Mack truck when it walked in. Thx for the support. Buffalo, baby. 
Great piece by about and just "playing catch".  
thanks for coming out brother. see you soon. 
Bye Bye Bama. Hello Buffalo! Can't say I've ever been to Buffalo before so excited to spend a coupla days there. 
you bet i did. threw in a snickers and a coke too in your honor. Now get busy winning Cali dude. Love, Lance 
Thanks to you all for coming out to support and First time I've eaten a burger in the middle of a ride. 
Another great endorsement for from  #YESon29 
Good morning Alabama - excited to be here for and help out a great cause. We can't ever forget what happened a yr ago today. 
damn, I'm jealous. Maybe we need some official lessons? 
jasper to Bessemer 
yes 
Excited to wake up early and fly to 'bama for Riding with a hero to many (myself included) for a great cause. 
we're all good. Just playing around. Have a good one. 
I will be there!! 
. Mary - you're a celeb!! 
Dear - I have been training very hard and my legs are tiiiired. PLEASE take it easy me Saturday afternoon! 
Down at ACL Live about to see Thanks and Tamra Wilson for the hook up. Bring it on 
thanks! Look after down there. 
how much did you swim today, homegirl? 
solo 
I do 
had this discussion today. 23 isn't enough. 
112 miles on the bike today in 95 degree weather. I'm fried. Is summer already here?!? 
Have cancer? Have kids? Check out Life changing FREE camp. Ask  
pretty much, yeah. 
which i clearly missed and i haven't spent the time understanding the "whys". Will now. 
Dear We're gonna have to 'agree to disagree' on this one which is cool by me. Oly dist races have changed over the years .. 
ain't that the truth. 
except one has always been that way, the other not. obviously oly dist tris have changed over the yrs. 
i'll take bauer's life over grewal's any day. 
u mean the guy (me) who reminded people it was a team sport? triathlon was always intended 2 b individual sport. 
ok, well, sorry you took it that way. not bagging you or your peers. just feel as if drafting ought NEVER be allowed. 
2miles/ 3k doesn't really exist around these parts. maybe try lost creek blvd up from barton creek to 360 
excuse me? when did i say it was a joke? is a draft legal tri "the race of truth"? NO. i certainly never called it a joke. 
very cool! 
we need details. 
IM France June 24. 
wasn't me. maybe 
thank you 
It has been almost 25 years but I'm excited to announce my return to St. Croix for the Ironman St. Croix 70.3. Beauty and the Beast. 
Happy birthday 
love the pic! My man livin' strong!! 
Great endorsement of by  #yeson29 
current set up is "a shampoo, blow dry, and 10k foot race" 
take out the wheel sucking and I'm in. 
i just lean to the right a bit. and that's not political speak. 
tell em you were on a bike! 
Who won the little 500? 
Sitting court-side with for the #spurs vs #lakers. These boys are big, fast, and physical. #gospurs 
Fun dinner at the house with Amos Lee, Hollace, AG, Kumi, and the kids. #oldsettlers 
congrats! 
oh yeah? It's pretty boring actually. 
RIP Levon Helm. 71 yrs old. Way too young. 
Excited for Austin Food and Wine festival end of this month. Tickets going fast. Check out  
Thanks to TX Rep McClendon for sharing your story and for raising awareness of minority cancer rates in Texas  #txlege 
very cool! Thx for the support. 
Thx for supporting last night at the Coxe Residence! Many thx to for their major investment in the campaign! #YESON29 
not this year 
alot 
it's up now 
Thanks to for showing me around the roads in/around the Santa Cruz Mtns. 112 miles and loved every second of it. 
Just left HQ. Great session with their team talking Thanks for all the support! #yeson29 
Wishing Warren Buffett the best with his recent diagnosis. Hang in there Oracle of Omaha. 
Insightful lunch with my good friend Tim Cook Talking and Appreciate his support. 
it is projected the proceeds will drop 3% annually due to cessation which is a good thing! 
Back from #Boston, unpack, repack, track workout, off to NorCal working on #yeson29 
Happy birthday 
Pulling for Daisy Merrick! Please check out  
just the people who know how to spell dude. 
and accounted for one of em. 
yes. Took it out about 6 months ago. 
Congratulations to and all runners on finishing a brutal Boston Marathon! Temps close to 90. 
Great piece by in the in support of  #yeson29 
Great workout with the swim team this morning. Thanks for letting me crash practice. I feel smarter already
 
no way dude but good luck! And remember, 20 miles is halfway. 
I'm fine with it since I will be on the roadside cheering on But for the runners it's a serious concern. 
Great 17 mile run along the Charles this morning. Perfect Spring day. 
Just landed in #Boston for the #BostonMarathon. Cheering on and Love this city. 
Congrats to for finishing 2nd at the U23 Liege Bastogne Liege. Proud of you dude! #bontragerlivestrong 
Tough 3700 yds in the pool this am. How is it that you miss a week of swimming and it's as if you've never even knew how to swim?? 
Happy birthday For your present I'll take it easy on you on that long ride next Wednesday. Ok, maybe not. 
I'm going to ride a road bike. 
I guess we need to start marketing and selling to petshops worldwide. Cc 
Planning on it 
I endorse Mihir Dubey. 
Ha, unfortunately yes. 
On the phone with my old bud Talking about potentially amazing new opportunity. 
Jetlag + 11 mile run at 8000 here in = suffering. 
Great job Gloria and team. at the #YMCA saves lives  
Loved the beatdown put on 
Happy birthday to 
Great news from $365,000 donation supporting “Yes on CA Prop 29” in June. Who’s next? 
More trash talk. Love it!  
Congratulations to the 2012 Community Impact Project winners:  
Great editorial by on  Vote #Yeson29! 
Just rode the entire #IMFrance course w/ Andy Schleck, Yves Cordier, and Technical, lots of climbing/descending, hard! 
#FS = follow sunday 
Congratulations to Tom #Boonen on another amazing Paris Roubaix victory, his fourth of his career. Very impressive. 
then throw some hardballs next time. 
apparently 2000 mts total. 
I would say clip ons. 
Great to spend time this morning with French legend Yves Cordier. Showed me around part of the #IMFrance course. Damn sure ain't flat! 
Happy Birthday to my godson Christian Bruyneel!! 
Great event today Thanks to the Nagles and Applbaums for all their support and passion. Off to Europe now. Oui Oui. 
Another fun group run (Thursday tradition) with Derek, L2, D Fuentes, Mellow Jack, and others. 
Solid article on our work in Dr. Nichols is in the interview too:  
appreciate your thoughts. Know it's hard being a big time college football coach. Crash at our house. 
thinking about it 
yessir. Check out my kicks tomorrow. 
Packing. Again. Up to Dallas for Dress For Yellow benefiting then off to Europe for Paris Roubaix with Can't wait! 
hmmm, maybe a twitter ride? 
go to and rent one! Lots to choose from. 
Very cool.  
Hey - congrats!!! 
... that's below the belt and shame on you for insinuating as much. I would NEVER do that to any of my 5 kids. Ever. 
To the fools in certain parts of the press who are saying I intentionally "ignored" my very own daughter at that finish of yesterday's race 
Check out article in today's on cancer's 'Tweens'. She's spot on. Good luck Suleika. 
haha!! Not a chance. Great toeing the line with you an congrats. Gutsy run and great win. 
no, thank you! 
Great day in Ft Worth Business Summit. All of us appreciate their customers support. They've raised 13 mil so far! 
This is troubling.  
more than u know 
any comment on the doping controls? 
I don't believe much of anything that's reported on VN even when it's not April Fools Day.. 
good to see ol RR's obsession hasn't waned. 
Well that hurt like hell!! Congrats to Tim O'Donnell and on their incredible performances. And thx to all the volunteers! 
Video check in from Galveston  
Been following the Looks, well, uh, pretty epic. I have to do this one day. 
damn. No pressure. 
Something ain't right with this pic.  
thanks mate! 
hell yeah!! 
Ann Richards, Pat Tillman, Bob Marley, Jesus Christ, and Nelson Mandela. 
you bet Carl. Just watched Dr. Evans' video. Can't agree more! 
Catching up with while puts the final touches on the legs for the Galveston 70.3 this wknd. 
i survived!! 
Congrats to the entire crew on what is about to be a record month! 
thanks! 
Thanks to all our amazing friends and partners who are in town for the Livestrong Assembly. #lsassembly12 
don't drown, don't crash, and stay injury free. 
and he has good taste in clothing. 
been there. Please wish him my best! 
Just ran around town lake w/ and Feeling solid for the wknd. 
France June 24 
Ominous weather forecast for Sunday's 70.3 in Galveston... #windandrain  
you figured it out 
thanks a ton. My finest hour. 
So proud to own this HUF x Haroshi x DLX piece that graces the cover of the new  
"TdF's first ever green jersey Fritz Schar"  
And finished 3rd overall behind Bobet and Kübler. 
Little known but amazing factoid about is his grandfather was Fritz Schär who won the 1st ever TdF green jersey. So cool. 
200 mt jog 
50/50. 
I am. Even more ready for Sunday.. 
Glad you received it! Hang in there! 
I'm backing Pat Summitt in her courageous fight w/ Alzheimers. She definitely knows how to #LIVESTRONG! 
hahahaha! you definitely got the better end of that deal. 
thanks brother. 
Here having lunch with We just decided he's changing his last name to Shiznit. 
good choice 
thx for sharing. Tim is a great supporter. 
Crowie. 
oh, he's still hanging around. 
that's too high. Could do it but would be "walking" the run. 
5mins 
I've heard that. Def on my list of to-do's 
the man is pure class. Be an honor for me to toe the line with him. 
well north of that 
30+ 
I can't tell you that! 
Last ride here in #kona b4 heading home. 6 x 10mins 70.3 RPP (Race Pace Power) followed by a steady 6 mi run building to RP (race pace). 
Great interview w/ my friend from Watch for her in 2012!!  
I'd say no. Neither are exactly easy tho. 
Dear whoever, please delivery these Kona winds again on Oct 13. Thanks in advance, Lance. 
ask 
today alternated between 74's and 80's. 
I was going 12 mph 
no sir. 
12 x 400 on the track at Kealakehe HS. Thanks to the Waverider Nation for letting me crash your campus! 
yeah. You wouldn't want to let this old man do that to you. 
Great ride with today. Classy guy. Enjoyed talking tris, kids, More Than Sport, etc. 
a long time! 
 
yes ma'am. 
haha!! 
RIP Jim Stynes. We'll miss you mate. 
Thanks Coach Steve for kicking my ass in the pool this morning. 35 x 100's on 1:30. Held :02's so I was happy with that. 
amen to that 
Went and checked out the energy lab on a 12 mile run this morn. Thx to for the run support. 
sorry to hear that Cathy. Please wish him my best. 
Congratulations to and on their respective wins this weekend! 
cool. Welcome to town neighbor. 
it blew away 
meow 
no big deal, eh? How about taking one of those spots for #imkona? You can do it! 
you're awe - inspiring! 
and I thought Shawshank was impressive. 
back down the Queen K to Hina Lani and up from there. 
6 hrs 
Rode 120 miles here in Hawai'i today. Out to Hawi and back then up Koloko. I'm completely fried now. 
very cool! 
Congrats to on a stellar ride in MSR. And a massive congrats to my bud on his incredible victory. #greatracing 
hang in there. Gotta stay strong for your friend. 
that's your best bet imo. 
absolutely. Check  
Thanks Ashleigh. Hope you're doing well and livin' strong. 
them and many others. 
Really digging my new iSport headphones here in Hawai'i on my longer runs. Now available 
more like 3:25 
haha. they are actually good friends of mine. 
if sitting in the car, standing on the track, and SUP'ing while i swim is "taking it easy on me" then yes 
of course 
Allez 
At dinner listening to tell stories. He's now onto an epic Rob Mackle story. 
haha, sorry. I reckon he's got a future. Could be bright enough to wear aviators at night. Never know. 
we all loved it! 
be there late April 
Wow! 250K votes cast so far in the Community Impact Project. One week left to vote:  
13.1 
that was 
Hey all you fans - check out his gran fondo!!  
Badass speed workout this morning at Kealakehe High School. 10 x 1000 at race pace. 200mt jog in between each. 
4-5 days per week 
hard run tomorrow am. Then an open water swim. Have fun up there! 
Great spending time with and others tonight for pau hana. Talking Hawaiian history, and other things. 
thx 4 the support out there! 
I completely agree 
and he made day when he said, "happy birthday". 
no worries. package is on its way 
he's on it 
70 mile ride here on the big island today w/ 3 repeats up Capt Cook race pace. 
for sure. Richardson Bike One is one of the best in the country. 
Just had an amazing BBQ sandwich at the Lighthouse Delicatessen in Hawi. Highly recommend it! 
#yeahyoudo 
it's definitely crossed my mind. 
happy bday beggy! 
17 miler this am here in Kona. Fun to run on the legendary Alii Drive. 
thanks for doing that back then but importantly, thanks for your service to our country. 
I'll take the latter. Safe travels. 
you bet. That wind totally sucked today. Headwind all day. So much for clean living. 
very cool. Thanks for the cheers. 
Video check in from the Big Island  
Congrats to for taking the leaders jersey in Tirreno Adriatico. Go Redneck! 
not today 
nah, I'd pass on that deal. 
Bummed to hear broke his collarbone today. Get well soon dude! #TeamLIVESTRONG 
lad? nuff said. 
Watched MARLEY on the way to Hawai'i yesterday. Man, what I'd give to hang with Bob for a week or so. Thx for sending DVD. 
I have 3 or 4. Capt cook, koloko, Mauna Kea, Kohala Ranch, or climb over the Kohalas from Hawi. 
I did. Ridden up Mauna Kea twice before. May do again this trip. 
wow, has quite the following. I guess I better start working on my kicking. 
not at all but my kids don't rate it too highly for their Spring Break. 
Thanks to Coach Steve and Kona Aquatics for a great swim this morning. 
So psyched to be back in Hawai'i. Love this place, it's diverse beauty, and most importantly, the people. See y'all out on the roads. 
take 4 
so sorry to hear about y'alls loss. Jerry was a great man. I will never forget him. 
Naaaasty 10 mile tempo run this morning with and others. 
ouch! How fast do u kick a 50? 
a 50 or a 500?!? 
Vote in the Community Impact Project. Bring programs to your town.  
Yes I would 
Thinking about Jerry Casale. Jerry is one of American cycling's greatest friends and supporters. Hang in there buddy. 
Great meeting with Excited about the prospects for a medical school and cancer center here in Austin. 
Very proud indeed!! RT proud to announce that has received a 4 out of 4 stars from  
Catching up with on all things related. He's currently in the Milan wind tunnel with 
amen to that 
roughly 4.5 hours 
Perfect day in #atx. 70 and sunny. Rode 90 miles and ran a hard 5 miles off the bike. Feeling good. 
exactly what I was telling myself today 
Congrats to on winning Great win for ! 
you know it. 
Swam 4500 this am and ran 15 this evening. Hated every step too. Note to self : do long runs earlier in the day. 
join a good program in your area. 
those were my road shows modified by cutting out the tongue. 
Over for our quarterly BoD meeting. Listening to present now. 
hydration and nutrition. 
To my fellow Texans - Happy Independence Day!  
interesting. We are seeing record growth across the board. 
safe to say she did 
Full day here in #atx. 10 mile nasty tempo run with and crew, 3500 in the pool, lunch now driving carpool! 
It's March already? 
never. 
no doubt. 
Brooke can help direct you. Gracias. 
insane 
And for the record, I welcome the testing. Anytime, anywhere. 
Had lots of ?'s on why I was tested this am since I'm "retired". Well, I'm a retired cyclist but now technically a professional triathlete. 
Good training day today. 90 relaxed miles on the bike then an evening trail run (more like a jog). 
Thanks to for including in the new timeline launch.  #innovation 
Pre 7am wake up this morning for an out of competition/unannounced anti-doping control courtesy of WTC. 
yeti!! What I the date exactly? 
Congrats to Mr and Mrs on their new arrival!! 
Just left the Texas Capitol. Honored to sit with the Royal family and to discuss   
At the TX State Capitol appearing with Edith and Coach Royal as they bring awareness to Alzheimer's research. in the house too. 
Thank you for your service Eric 
many moons ago, yes. 
Wishing a very happy birthday. 
deal. Just gimme some notice. Can always hook you up with one 
You bet! Not back there til late june...start training now! Or come on down to Austin. Would love to host you 
Congrats to the Caveman on winning SA. Props to for 3rd as well. #twoclassydudes 
it's looooong. 
headed out now. Thx for the offer. 
very cool! See you there 
After an inspiring night with the Champ I got up and ran 14. #generationAli 
"Service to others is the rent you pay for your room here on earth" - Muhammad Ali. #generationAli 
Had a great ride this morning with a large group of supporters of Thanks to you all for coming out. 
Get well soon Madiba!! 
you bet. Heal up quick. 
yes, we are 100% serious. Saves lives, economic driver for the state, major boost to higher ed. Yes on #prop29 
Keith's last name. 
yes 
Lucky to miss the wreckage today. (collarbone), (scaphoid), and (elbow) less lucky. Hang in there boys! 
gotta love the last line. 
Had a good (and bad) ride with the team today. Was going great til a massive pile up after 4 hrs. Carnage. 
has definitely been discussed. 
Great dinner with in Santa Barbara tonight. Talking Prop 29, CA politics, etc. Grateful for his support of #prop29. 
Check 
it's posted 
Figueroa KOM results from team today. 1st 2nd 3rd 4th 5th 
Tough ride w/ the kids today. Two times up Figueroa Mtn. Ouch!! 
nice work!! 
Good 60 mile ride with the fellas followed by a 5 mile run w/ ! 
If u are in Austin this weekend check out events starting this Thursday  rides, social events, & more 
If u are in Austin this weekend check out events starting this Thursday  rides, social events, & more 
En route to California to train with the boys. I hope they're ready... 
cool! See ya there. 
winter = north. Summer = south? 
Thinking of my buddy tomorrow and upcoming weeks. Good luck on the BMT. #LIVESTRONG 
Another great dinner with and #tangotuesday 
Hey - let me add my voice 2 the millions pulling 4 U. Go on, kick some cancer ass! And let us know if/how we can ever help 
bring it 
tell me about it. 
great news! 
haha!! 
check out the peeps n lanes 1/2. Kemp, Foley, Stapleton. I'd put that group up against any 
Tough w/o. MS - 4x150's on 1:45, 6x100's pull on 1:10, 8x75's fast on 1:10. All distances short course yards. 
has it on his acct 
that was I did the extra miles. 
I agree 
Just finished a 90 mile ride out in the TX Hill Country. 71, Bee Creek, Fall Creek, Hamilton Pool, Fitzhugh. 
I said that was the MS (main set). Not the entire workout. 
Solid 3500mts in the pool this morning with MS - 4x250, 4x200, 4x150. 
Making an appearance? Yes. On a bike? No way. 
Yes, I went to 170's 
How good is Incredible. 
2.5 yrs. glad it's out. 
never 
Congrats to on winning the Western Slope Champs!! 
Oh no, put himself to sleep.  
fact 
Up early and headed to the Marathon. Nearly 20,000 runners. Gonna be a great day! 
Let's all raise a glass to Ray Shriver at 8pm MST (7 PST, 9 CST, 10 EST). Man was loved by many. 
Just finished the R part of an SBR day. 
and thanks to you. first and foremost for your friendship. secondly, for all your input on Prop 29. 
Hey #LIVESTRONGMarathon fans, follow our run on Sunday with the free app. Thx for the support  
talking about that case of wine he had to buy me after Boston one year?? 
Sad to hear about the passing of Ray Shriver. Thoughts go out to and his entire family. 
Back in #atx. Haven't run since and about to hit it. This is gonna hurt. 
Having lunch with my chill sis She's a hero of mine. A woman worth following! 
and getting soaked along the way. 
Hey Californians - Please vote yes on Prop 29!  
thanks for coming out! 
Stopped by to see my buds as they prepare for their new show. Looks incredible. 
“@amyebartlett: Listening to & speak about CA Prop 29. (vote yes) #LIVESTRONG 
thanks for the custom LS versions. Love 'em. 
Any decent programs in LA? And preferably not ones that workout at 5am. 
Heading to Los Angeles w/ and to promote Prop 29 (@CA4acure). 
I sure picked a hard "hobby" then. I reckon golf or fishing is easier. 
you go girl 
Finally, great to see Laurent Jalabert out there too. Always enjoyed racing him 'back in the day'. 
And a sincere 'gracias' to the incredible Panamanian public for coming out en masse to support ALL of these amazing athletes. 
Uh.... that was painful! Can't complain tho. Very happy with my race and 2 be back in the tri game. Congrats to on the win. 
muchas gracias amigo!! 
Average start time for a TdF stage? 12 noon. Wake up? 9am. This triathlon stuff... 6:45 start wake up 3:45. Big difference. 
Well, got my first pro pre-race mtg under my belt. Fast swim (big current), hard bike, flat run. And hotter than donut grease. 
thanks for the props dude. 
oui 
nice to meet u too. Good luck! 
Want live updates on Sunday from Try or ! 
pro 
Watched the movie Drive on the way to Panama. A true love story. 
Easy 4 mile jog with Now we're off to Excited to finally visit #panama. 
Check out my rig for this weekends race in Panama. I'm psyched!  
I love it when I see people taking down their Christmas lights. In February. 
So who’s with me and for an this year?  #ironman 
After 20 yrs of getting the question I'm happy to say YES I will be racing in a in 2012  
Another amazing dinner tonight with Best sushi anywhere! 
go friend go. All my best. 
Watch this! Powerful.  
thanks jack. 
Go 
 
uh, yeah, sure. 
Happy birthday Welcome to the 40 club. 
it's the only way cowards have the courage. 
thank you!! 
nice ride dude 
When I got off the bike today I heard about the passing of our friend Geoff Hollister. We will miss him dearly. 
4600 yds in the pool this morning. Feeling good. 
Great 15 mile run this am in Austin. Thanks to for the run support! 
Tomorrow is #WorldCancerDay. I'm running 15 around Town Lake in honor of the #28 million dealing with this disease. 
Thinking about my RAGBRAI teammate Drew Wall. Keep fighting my friend! 
I have it on my calendar. 
Proud standing w/ in support of #PlannedParenthood fund:  #accesstocare 
Thanks to Muhammad and Lonnie Ali for the amazing gift. Greatest of all time.  
train alot, avoid injuries, and race smart (start conservative). 
likewise my man. Had just finished a great ride with the punks. 
great, velonews campaigning for something that will hit town when they are out of business. 
always. 
put it on his acct. check it out there. 
looking likely. i sure hope so. 
it ain't gonna happen. ever. 
Ran our thurs "tempo" run this am (which was all out!) then rode 65 with the boys. First day of camp for them. Some great kids. 
haha. All good. You? Don't let your dad see your crazy twitter avatar. 
yessir. I will be there. 
Go Livestrong! 
couldn't drop him. sumbitch always hangs tough 
Great training day. 2600 in the pool, 85 miles on the bike, then 5 mi run straight off the bike. Nearly 80 degrees in ATX. 
yes. I don't agree with it. 
first I've heard of it 
excuse me, did I miss something here. I have no clue what you're talking about. 
well, fuck. Not good. 
thanks my man! Likewise bro. 
yes! Took some Immodium AD the other day when I had the 1.5's 
Up and at 'em early. Ran 7 and swam 2600. Quick breakfast then on the bike. Dear Sun, please come out. Thank you, Lance 
As if I didn't miss Hawai'i enough. Just saw The Descendents. Incredible movie. Don't miss it. 
for sure 
Back to life. Ran 4 and rode 40 w/ 
coming around. Thanks. 
Just watched the documentary Interesting, real, and very intense. 
Check out my buddy special tonight "Big Hits" 8pm est. As some1 who recently had a concussion, I can tell you it's serious 
Congrats to on winning today's 3M half marathon here in Austin in 1:14 (!!) Been fun running on thurs am's. 
well, if you live in the echo chamber like they do then it was. 
Been sicker than a dog the past 4 days. No activity is killing me! Gonna attempt to go for a walk/run. 
very interesting. 
better bring a lock too. 
cabs are impossible to get. 
good luck caveman 
I'm feeling like Chan Ho Park today. 
some people, for their own sake, just shouldn't do radio interviews. 
Fun (but hard) 4 hr ride w/ the youngsters and today. looking good for 2012. 
Just left and I hosted the crew who keeps Air Force One flying safe and sound. We appreciate their service! 
Happy birthday to my good friend 
best city in America, hands down. 
heck yeah. You go girl. Proud of you. 
Just ran 14 miles. Part of which was around Town Lake. Love seeing so many Austinites out and about and keeping fit. 
In honor of all the 16yr olds who kicked my ass yesterday I had to watch Sixteen Candles with my kids last night. 
damn, girl. that's for real. proud of you! 
OUCH!!! 5 minutes and 8 seconds of torture! 
Warmup done. Ready for the 500. Psyched!! 
wow, some night you had. 
I realized I messed up handle. Sorry 
Just got a text from who's at the swim meet. A 12 yr old girl just went 5:05. Oh lord. 
true 
If you're at Sundance tonight go see Getting Up, a great doc on our friend paralyzed graffiti artist TEMPT: 7:30 at Treasure Mountain Inn 
4:30 
Just rode 95 miles around lake travis. 77 degrees and sunny here in #atx. Not bad for jan 20! 
Lots of guesses already. Went 4:51 twenty five yrs ago. 
just like the site who was the recipient of the potshot! Onward. 
Wanna know what makes me nervous? First swim meet in the last 25(!) years tomorrow. Swimming the 500 free. Guesses on my time? 
that wasn't a potshot at James. Directed elsewhere. 
Congrats to Jake Burton on his recent good news. Keep livin' strong my friend. 
Please disregard latest tweets. #hacked 
I am probably not the best person to ask this question. Shoot me another. 
While I was in NYC I picked up two new paintings I bought out of his latest show. They are amazing! 
I AGREE!!! 
A rare opportunity to race on one of the cooler MTB circuits in Central Texas.
 
I'd love to. 
Cool and innovative product from + Fuelband Life is a sport. #makeitcount  
man, no doubt. I was freezing! 
Early run here in (freezing) NYC. Headed to a cool global product launch for Stay tuned. 
Why's everyone hating on soap today? I'm confused. 
correct. And you do a damn good job of it. Sent you a dm. 
a bit like the site you write for? 
be ready to suffer on the run. They hurt like hell. 
likewise! 
Spent 12 hrs in Austin. Played with and swam 3000, rode an hour. Now off to NYC. 
Wow. Powerful series of photos from  
please wish her my best 
Brett, great to meet you. Take care. 
not all but most. 
cool! Thx for the offer. Flying out now. Raincheck! 
Just spoke annual international sales meeting. Been with this great company for 25 years! 
Tough brick session today here in Los Angeles. 70 on the bike, 6 on the run. has the route here.  
update re: this "stuff" soon. 
i don't want nonna that 
it's in jersey! 
fatty? 
Who wouldn't want to bike on car-free NYC streets? Five Boro Bike Tour Lottery begins today. bikenewyork.org #bikenyc #TDFBBT 
Spent the afternoon in San Diego (the whales vagina) working on a future project. #LSWT 
train alot. 
2day,  is donating HALF of everything they sell to A good reason/day to pick up some awesome cycling gear! 
"Of all the forms of inequality, injustice in health care is the most shocking and inhumane" -- Martin Luther King, Jr. 
Cabo sunrise.  
that's my plan right now. Haven't swam a meet since I was 15. Slightly nervous. 
you're in the best care you can be. Great hospital, great docs, and great nurses. best of luck. 
that's for sure. leave the bike at home. 
I'm with Best food experience in all of Cabo. Don't miss it when you come down. 
It was an incredible honor to have 
@shuttlecdrkelly and staying in our home this weekend. #twoinspiringhumans 
Thanks! Miss #adelaide as well. Hope it's a great race. 
I'm in Mexico so I missed it. Damn!! 
Followed the US Olympic Marathon trials online. The speeds these folks (male AND female) is unimaginable. 
So proud of my friend Dustin Yellin.  
Tough 90 mile ride today. Sucks when you head north into a headwind then it turns south just when it's time to head home. #headwindallday 
tree falling in the woods. 
My buddy is helping Rocketkidz Foundation by talking
about goal setting. Check it out.  
Thanks  

I'm sure will post it. He "hung" with the group today. 
Another great bomb run this am. Starting to run like my old PESH days. 
come join us. Every thurs at 8am at the rock. 
wish him my best 
skinning and skiing. 
agh, no problem for a strong woman to follow a guy. Go for it! 
I will be there. 
Good meeting tonight with Austin mayor Talking about America's coolest city. Alot of great things happening. 
Very excited & partnered w/ us 4 these new iSport headphones. Available in Feb!  
Man's a hero. Period. 
Psyched to be in #toronto to see and hang with the fine folks from I love me some Canada. #wheresthesnow? 
Enjoyed the Jeremy Geddes profile in the new I'm a huge fan of his work. 
thanks man! yes, let's think of something. 
very cool. Thank you. I may have to join you. 
Great few days here WHQ. Great things past, present, and future. They are amazing partners. 
Nike came out in force on their campus today for our 15th year anniversary. Honored to be partners. #WhyILivestrong  
Happy bday ! 
thanks man. That was a nasty set! 
you may still 
me. And lots of it 
ICE 
Ran 15mi today. Scenic, Lake Austin, 7 mile loop around Town Lake, back home on Shoal Creek trail. 1000's of people on Town Lake. Cool 2 see 
Reading travel section. Rates top 45 places to travel to in 2012. Panama is # 1. Hmm, interesting. 
75 miler on the bike followed by a hard(ish) tempo 5 mile run. 75 and sunny here in Austin, Texas. Perfect. 
I wish but hell no 
thanks joe! 
Salt Lick or Lamberts 
focus on strength/core/stability. 
Happy birthday 
Had a great fitting today with Kevin Livingston. Working on a few things. 
because it's a bike shop. Try 
covering RATT. Yes!  
Heading to Portland on Monday to celebrate 15 Years Fighting Cancer with my partners at Nike #WhyILivestrong 
You know you have a problem when you have 2 international trips in the next week and your passport expires tomorrow. Oops. 
G4! How are ya man? 
You had to know Spiderman would have the last laugh. 
Great piece on  
Fast and fun group run this AM around Lady Bird Lake. Great to be back in ATX. 
sitting in my garage 
what's that? 
Oui. Bien sur! 
12 grams of fat per! 
or 
Sat in for a song with my buddy last night. Good times!  
I must say - nails it.  
I'm about to see my bud play. Such a gentleman. 
55 mile ride w/ in Talking all things as well as trying to figure where a coupla 40 something can go race 
almond 
big bowl all the way 
The Broncos have a player named Lance Ball. #classic 
i'm w/ ya. i'm close to being full time. making a huge difference 
it's wrong that you're asking .. 
you should talk... 
looks a lot like to me 
Watching the Chiefs/Broncos game. You think Kyle Orton is a little motivated? 
no but my training partner always logs our training on his acct 
sorry to hear that. Wish him my best. 
Kick started #2012 with a 13 mile run. Another beautiful day in the Roaring Fork Valley. 
no doubt. been working on that. 
Happy New Year! 
what you got? 
3600 in the pool then a nasty indoor trainer workout on the bike designed by 
i heard you loud and clear. thanks for the heads up. 
ain't that the truth. i managed to make it home safe and sound despite being a Texan. 
FIGHT CANCER, SWIM, BIKE, RUN, LIVESTRONG! HOW ARE YOU GOING TO #MAKEITCOUNT? gonike.me/makeitcount 
Rode 40 miles in today. Temps in the 50's. Bad for skis good for bikes. 
Happy birthday ! 

dude - Give us the scoop! Who threw it down? 
I'm again reminded of just how proud I am of our home  
Hook em horns! 
ha! Boulder cheese at it's finest. 
ha! Nobody will tell. 
that's a fact 
Just ran 13 miles w/ Homegirl destroyed me. If anyone sees me limping around then you'll know why. 
and a man's gotta shower every now and again. 
the half 
Happy New Year to you as well and GOOD LUCK. 
Ran into Madeleine Albright today - highlight of my day. 
both! 
easy choice 
Thanks! 
Someone's paying attention. 
damn!! Sorry to hear that. Hang in there. 
Off to Haven't traveled in a month. Was about to go nuts! 
Ever get sick of traffic when you're riding your bike? Then ride on Xmas day! Best day of the year for a bike ride. 
Merry Christmas. 
Thanks to and all their customers for supporting Happy holidays!!!  
not that I know of! 
The trouble with trouble is it starts out as fun. 
Merry Xmas!!! To all of you in Australia and NZ! 
Ran 13 this AM here in a chilly Austin, TX. Nearly froze my off. 
that's what I call a merry Xmas! 
thanks and likewise. I have a feeling I'll be on the big island ALOT in 2012. 
Today is the 40th anniversary of the National Cancer Act. So much more to do.  #LIVESTRONG 
4 more and we're there! 
you're welcome. Thx for being a great friend. 
Wow. #WhatAYear with and you! Your support makes a huge impact on so many lives. From the bottom of my heart, thx. 
yes she did 
The Fab Five. and  
Wow! RT New event for 2012: Climb Mt. Kilimanjaro with for  
Happy holidays from our team to yours!  
Thx for your service RT Just hit 10me years of active duty service in the USAF today. Any chance of a RT? 
Great 12 mile run this AM around ATX. Massage time then Brady vs Tebow. 
Happy birthday 
happy birthday!!! 
mine was a double cheeseburger from Sonic and a large FF. Top that. 
4hrs on the bike w/ out to Johnson City then a 4 mile run off the bike. 4 and 4. Double what Chuck used to say. 
both are great but I'm a Kona guy myself 
Happy birthday 40, uh, 3?!? 
no. 
Easy ride, easy run, not so easy swim, lunch and now grabbing and from school. 
Chris Hitchens has passed. His courage & candor about cancer was incredible. #braveandbrilliantman 
Dr. Marci Campbell. You made such an impact in the lives of those affected by cancer.  
I am in full support. When is it? 
Congrats  
depends on the terrain in your area. 
A match made in #Austin.  partnership extended through 2020. 
Good tempo run this am org'd by Jack of Joe Thorne, Derek and and others. Thx gang 
good luck to george's sis 
damn, I wish! Not there in Jan. Will be in March. Thx for asking. 
all good choices but Austin wins every time. Asheville in second. 
Great to see and spend some time w/ SRAM founder Stan Day this afternoon. One of the best guys in the bike business and a great partner. 
there's a good chance 
Hard 4 hour ride w/ the fellas Lawson, Gavin, and Nathan. I was suffering! 
high 
7 tours, a WC, 2 dauphines, few classics, nationals, and one brown santa 5k. What time at wahoos? 
Congratulations for my great friend and teammate Chechu Rubiera for becoming a daddy for the second time!! 
not a chance. i paid my entry fee just like everyone else. 
Hey - thanks for sending me a copy of a book we should ALL read!  
Infographic of the day - sharing results from South Africa campaign.  #health 
Sad to wake up to the news of passing. I wish I could have met the man that was so loved by so many. RIP Clint. 
Just watched the Cowboys game. Ugh. 
Incredible dinner tonight w/ Can't wait for his new record. And of course UT vs Ole Miss in 2012. 
Ran today w/ Dead tie. Here's his file from the race.  
Ran the Brown Santa 5k this morning. Avg'd 5:23's. A little Sunday sufferin'. . . 
yes! 
Hey looking good on the coverage today. 
Congrats RG3 RT Very happy for Robert Griffin. Terrific, smart guy. 
that's a fact 
Watching on TV. 
that's right. Just off the bike w/ 
that would be me. 
I'm Anniversary party watching I'm a huge fan of them. Also, thanks to my good friend for all he does. 
That time of the year again - the time where the media picks people/athletes of the year, etc. This one is simple folks. It's 
on its way!! 
Can't say I disagree RT Day 4 of the Thinking it should be re-named The Engine # 2 Diet. 
!!RT Check out natural energy. Buy 2 boxes bars/chews, get box of energy waffles free  
i don't believe it. 
thank you! 
no doubt. He's a good man too. Always a true gentleman. 
Tested mine out at the Austin Challenge this year. New #LIVESTRONG Cycling Jerseys now available:   
it definitely is. Come on down. 
And welcome to everyone visiting Austin for 
Just ran around town lake w/ Also saw and ran w/ former pro triathlete Olivier Bernhard. Good too see him. 
honored!! 
has never sounded better. Brilliant. This is one hour of music you cannot miss. Sit back and enjoy.  
At dinner with Having to show this AZ boy what good sushi is like. 
Anyone do Extracorporeal Shock Wave Therapy in Austin? 
I'm a big fan 
i just swim at a local program here in Austin. Great group of folks. 
Listening to the new Black Keys. Sounds damn good. Of course Danger Mouse can make anyone sound great, well almost anyone. 
Ran 7 around the lake w/ followed by a hard swim w/ and others. Bout to stuff my face now. 
not even in the same zip code 
depends on the course 
still pondering this. 
Ran 8 today then swam w/ Kemp, and Schweppe. 
Just watched win his first tournament in 2 yrs. Congrats dude. 
Happy bday ! My brother from another mother. 
Seriously laughing my ass off....  
now that's damn funny 
What exactly does that mean to "suspend" a presidential campaign? Seems to me you're either in or out. 
Hey great interview w/ CEO 
hello 
Oops, meant "thank" and not "think"! Duh. 
I'd like to think for coming to the party last night.  
I'm for our quarterly BoD meeting. 
Tons of fun at the gala with emcee'ing the awards. Thx to all who grew a mo! #livestrong!! 
Driving carpool and rocking my Karma fully covered. 
thanks man! 
haven't seen it but I'd like to go to Israel! 
that is a serious problem. 
got it 
we did about 80 miles. 
Out riding with riders and  
great question. one of the reasons is so vitally important. 
Beautiful day in Austin. Ran around the lake and now headed to the pool. Suffering after a week of vaca! 
Holiday shopping today. My kids all want iPhone4S's, so think we'll try out 1 each on and   
Cool to talk partnerships over dinner w/ and his team along with and Morgan. 
Watch this. has never sounded better.  
Gotta love starting the week with some interesting and incredible news. 
on my mind. Go girl. Livestrong. 
And got to see a hero of mine - Hicham El Guerrouj!  
Stopped in Puerto Rico and spoke at Nike's Central/Eastern Europe FA12 Sales meeting. Honored and proud to talk w/ them all. 
Sunset in Canouan.  
very 
not sure yet. still thinking about that. 
What better than sitting in the Bequia harbor? Sitting in it w/ on 10. 
Yes indeed. RT Maggie Daley was a gracious & couragous lady. God bless her soul 
Tom Cruise doing the intro for the UT vs A & M game. Seriously? 
Great Thanksgiving dinner here in Bequia with the Armstrong and Knaggs family. Hope you're all having a great holiday. 
Rocking my in Mustique. Coming along, eh?? Yeah, I know.Weak still.  
Happy Thanksgiving!! 
this was shot near petit st vincent and petit martinique. 
Amazing sunset.  
A 
Spending the Thanksgiving holidays sailing around the Grenadines. Paradise! And so much to be thankful for. 
I do! 
To my fellow NASCAR fans - this championship close enough for us? Sheesh.. 
Sad to hear about the passing of Teddy Forstmann. May he RIP. 
Happy birthday to and 10 yrs old! 
Finally back in the pool. Collarbone all healed up. Cruisy 3000 yds this am. pushing the pace today. 
Yes!  
Finally changed my avatar. Thanks to for sending over the pic. 
Sitting around listening to tell stories about working at Second Sole in SB back in the 80's. Small world. 
Just worked out w/ Gotta try and get back in some sort of shape. 
Not alot going on down there. Is F1 dead in Austin? Would be ashame if so.  
"you can't hurt me" 
muchas gracias! 
Back at the hotel hanging w/ David and Susan Axelrod. Talking kids, politics, etc. #interesting 
Fun dinner here in Miami w/ and Speaking tomorrow am. Looking fwd to it. 
Check out the cool progress down under in Adelaide, home of the #LIVESTRONG Cancer Research Centre  
Hilarious.  
if it was an hour ago then it coulda been. 
Hey welcome to Twitter. #bestpartyband 
Yes!! RT At a town council meeting in Kona to support the proposed bill that will reduce single use ...  
Yes! RT Well deserved honor Fdn recognized as 1 of the top 3 most effective US-based nonprofits in the cancer sphere 
not nearly as good as your 
Mid Nov and we're out on Lake Austin on an 80 deg night w/ Gotta love ATX! 
Thx to my friend for giving $4mill to 2 help LA schools! 
Someone just came up to me and told me my is A LOT more impressive in person than in my last pic. #fuckyeah 
7 weeks.. 
Almost halfway into and, uh, yeah. I'm trying!!  
RIP Evelyn Lauder. RT  a really remarkable woman --what a legacy. 
Still nursing this collarbone surgery. Walked around Lady Bird Lake w/ and 
Uh oh.  
does your bike have gears? 
Thanks to all our veterans! Past, present, and future. They make up the best team in the world. 
Happy birthday to the US Marine Corps. #semperfi 
Good idea. RT it would make a good auction item… 
Nice to have this hardware out.  
One of the best athletes to ever walk the planet. Period.  
My first week of my stache is downright weak and pitiful. 
no 
what?!? You mean it isn't looking like freddy mercury?? 
thank you! Great to meet y'all out that night as well. 
i'd be there but getting the plate taking off/out from my collarbone break from '09 
great man 
Ran into Davide Cassani after the marathon 2day as well. Never forget getting bitched out by him (in Italian) at '93 TdF. Great dude tho! 
So kicked some major ass today. First marathon, only a couple months of training, runs 3:38. #impressive 
3:38 
Yes it is!! RT This place is about to rock! #fightlikehell  
Good call. Works great. RT go to ing website. Tracking works there 
Love the idea of this app for the NYC marathon for tracking runners, maps, etc. Only problem - it doesn't work. 
Happy birthday to My chill sis. 
good luck! I miss Adelaide. 
sleeping! 
I'm w/ and 
Hook 'em! 
So cool to have 225 runners who have raised more than $850k for the #NYCINGM #LIVESTRONG 
no bike this trip. Juggling 5 kids instead. 
Just got to NYC. Cheering on and in the NYC marathon Sunday. Good luck ladies! #mile20ishalfway 
Go 
was in mtgs today re: this.. 
Great news!  
Livestrong quick strike women's graphic heart tee available Feb2012.  
Livestrong quick strike mens graphic tee available Feb 2012.  
Here's a first look at a Livestrong mens free trainer 5.0 availableApril 2012.  
In all day mtgs here at Nike going over Spring 2013 product collection. Stuff looks great! 
Heading to Portland now but had to hit the In and Out on my way out though. WHY are these not in Texas?? 
Inspiring night at the dinner before the Mike Nosco Ride for Ronette. Thx to you all for the support. Zap and Dakota, we love you both. 
Shot of the entire crew from today's Mich Ultra shoot. Thanks for making it easy!  
uh....avoid the first three words of the article? 
is a true inspiration. 
no offense but that's easy to do 
Have you been affected by recent cancer drug shortages? Read/Take the survey:  then PLEASE RT 
Out in Malibu shooting a new print ad campaign for Michelob Ultra. Jackie Treehorn let us in. 
If you are in LA tomorrow come out and support the Mike Nosco ride for Ronette.  
Who's starting their today?? I am. 
Check out the Best of book to help Fatty fund his Cancer Caretaker book project! Thanks!  
Ok you F1 fans - progress at the Circuit of the Americas here inAustin.  
Happy Birthday Kinky Friedman. 
Hey - congrats on the arrival of 
I'm dressing up as tonight. 
"If" I had a few hundred million bucks I'd buy the Dallas Cowboys then get the hell outta the way. 
Hanging out with and following the playoff game. 2 goals from Go Sporting!! 
Jimmy Stynes, we are all thinking of you and are sending healing energy your way from all around the world!! 
impressive! 
no sir, back to the fam. Got girl's vball tourney and son's football game tomorrow. May squeeze in a ride in ATX if I'm lucky. 
thanks! Was a fun time. 
true 
Also had a fun chat/talk with the fine folks from Nuance Communications here for their annual sales kickoff. 
Proud to stand with partners Drs Frenk, Knaul, Shulman and to launch the new GCCA report toda...  
Sweet RT My Cronus CX project. 15.13lb's as is.@srmtraining, Aelous 3's, Red.  
Driving to the airport. My favorite pastime. 
Looking forward to introducing Delivering Hope  symposium tomorrow. 
they have half chance of success 
C'mon RANGERS!!! 
the other 
Me too! RT Looking forward to seeing "The Education of Dee Dee Ricks" tonight on HBO at 8:30 EST. #navigation 
I like their chances. Great potential. 
happy birthday 
Great discussion here w/ Dr. Agus. Honored to be here! 
yes 
Watched the 20 documentary on my way to San Diego. Dug it. 
Leaving Hawai'i and headed to CA. Looking forward to speaking w/ Dr. David Agus this afternoon. #tedmed 
Great to have at today. Wish I could be there. Folks, check out his #TakeChargeFoundation  
The #LIVESTRONG is filling quickly. Secure a spot with and run with a reason.  
And a big shout out to for a great win today. #impressive 
I did! 
Don't remember the last time I cracked a helmet. In fact, I don't remember much! 
Then suffered in the run. Thanks to all who came out and THANK YOU to all of the volunteers!! 
Tough but fun day today Went out too hard in the swim, finally got going on the bike but took a nasty spill at the end. 
Just dropped of my gear at the transition area. Umbrella, couple lounge chairs, a pitcher of mai tais. Hope to make it out in under 15mins. 
And a happy early bday to Will he serve up another piece of cake 'whoop ass' on us all tomorrow? 
Went for a short ride here on the bike course then rode the run course. It's nasty too! 
Want to follow WC tomorrow?   and  Pass it on. 
yes. SRAM XX. 
just under 21lbs 
With a touch of and love.  
My rig for Sunday's World Championships in #Maui.  
29'er Superfly w/ Bonty 29-1 tires (2.2). 
Rangers! 
My thoughts on Worlds –   via 
Is it just me or has Bryant Gumbel just completely lost the plot? 
yep, I think I'll be there. 
Flora Farm! Don't miss it. 
yes 
Listening to Johnny Cash covering a few songs. Heart of Gold, Hurt, One, I Won't Back Down, and Solitary Man. Insanely good. 
wow. That's picking em up and putting em down. 
that I do. 
Just pre-rode the Worlds course here in #Maui. Damn nasty but fun!! 
Ever use a Guidebook? Comment on the blog  Tell how it helped you #FightFear. 
Damn... Someone sent the Team Astana team plane to take us to Maui.  
strasburg (sp?) sock has helped a ton 
anything to help. DM me. 
Celebrating 1st bday!! 
Listening to the latest from Highly recommend checking them out. 
Had ?'s about what bike I had n the Painted Church shot. That's my Superfly w/ slicks. + kick ass matte black & paint scheme. 
Painted Church w/ and jimmyriccitello  
They keep coming RT Hey - remember this one? You, Ned, Erin Baker. 1991 Monterey, CA. Challenge of Champs  
20 yrs ago, wow. RT '92 Longsjo Classic. Blast from (s) past. Still got the autograph.  
racing as a pro age grouper. 
no doubt. Flying it high. Thanks for the support. 
Great to be back on the Big Island of Hawai'i. 
yes but I gotta spend some time with my big island brethren first. 
Got my #RSiPhone 4S from today, cause apparently if your phone doesn’t talk back to you, #UNeedANewPhone. 
thanks brother! Safe travels. 
Now I'm headed to the airport and Kona bound! World Champs next wknd. I'm in! Looking fwd to racing. 
Awesome #ridefortheroses this morning. Thanks to everyone for coming out and riding. And thanks to all the vaolunteers! Livestrong! 
I'd say so. Thanks for all you do fatty. 
And can't thank enough for coming down and supporting 
What a night Thx to you all for being here and supporting us and our mission. Livestrong!! 
Great night at the house tonight w/ some amazing supporters here for #ridefortheroses! 
great to see you and angie! Love the hair. 
Just crushed 107 hard miles here in the Hill Country w/ Rocked the Superfly 29'er w/ slicks. Loved it! 
 
In town for weekend and wondering what to do late night?  
Hanging at the house w/ Talking art, tattoos, travel, cars, Austin, LA, his 4 kids, and my 5! 
in front of his mural Speaking to the art class from Eastside Memorial HS.  
Thanks Ethan!! RT Excited to be heading to Austin today to support my #Livestrong homies and their Ride for the Roses Weekend. 
GREAT idea! 
Thanks to Sirius Sprectrum for continuing to play Chris Whitley. Miss that man. 
good luck brother. #alwayson 
working on his mural Can't thank him enough for coming to Austin.  
incredible. Please tell her thanks! 
Thanks dude! RT Really looking forward to the Austin Livestrong Challenge this week-end. 
oops, sorry. My bad. Large groups of women are intimidating I guess. Next time we're on. 
Moral of the story? Be your own best advocate. RT “What the PSA debate means to men”  
Sad to hear about the passing of Never had the opp to meet the young man but he sounds like a true hero. 
and saw it coming for a ways. Don't worry - that was about the 1000th time I've seen it. 
Congrats #6? 
Back in #ATX. Quick/fun/productive trip! Less than 24hrs round trip. Great to see wet roads here. 
you're welcome! 
Fun race today here in Tempe. Thx to Four Peaks, all the spectators, and all the volunteers! Happy to get the win. 
Incredibly inspiring performances today. Congrats to all who participated. 
Had a blast w/ team SwimSTRONG at the Lake Travis Relay. Off to phx now and trying follow via twitter. 
Team SwimSTRONG out to a solid lead. Team is Sean Foley, Chris Kemp, and yours truly. 
Start of the Lake Travis Relay. Team SwimSTRONG is ready!  
Read board member/oncologist (and my doc), Dr. Craig Nichols, on the cancer drug shortage.  #notacceptable 
Fun wknd of racing coming up. 12 mile Lake Travis open water relay tomorrow am then Four Peaks Urban dirt tri Sunday in Tempe. 
cash in? What the hell are you talking about? 
Tmrw start Across America: Milwaukee 2 New Orleans to fund kids' cancer research.  
not a damn thing 
no sir 
Best football game so far this year is on ESPN 2 right now.. Plano East (HS I barely went to) vs Allen. Go Panthers! 
or a ride while throwing the football. 
well they are not far off. Sat - Lake Travis Relay (12 miles) then Sunday in Phx at Papago Park. 
my training partner uses Check there. 
Happy birthday 
did. 
Hard (and wind) 5 hour ride in the TX Hill country today. Bee Caves, 71, Fall Creek, Cypress Mill, Johnson City, Old 101 back in. 
see my last response to 
it's simple. Great coaches never lose games they just run out of time. After all that's what this is all about. 
"A computer is the most remarkable tool that we've ever come up with. It's a bicycle for our minds" - Steve Jobs 
Devastated 2 hear about the passing of Steve Jobs. Was blessed 2 have the opportunity to spend time w/ him on several occasions. May he RIP. 
zzzzz. 
Last minute help: PLEASE vote for partners now.  These kids need our support!!! 
Happy birthday 
Just had an MRI done on my plantar fasciitis. Sick of this! Most frustrating sports injury I've ever dealt with. 
that was me. 29'er w/ slicks. 
Open water swim on Lake Austin w/ Kemp, Foley. Lake Travis Relay this wknd. Who's in?? 
congrats! 
Appreciate art and wanna support Check out this cool auction. www.artmereartpere.com. Thanks! 
I agree.  
Tough being a Cowboys fan these days.. 
Just ran 10.2 miles around Lady Bird Lake. Beautiful day in #ATX. 
actually sounds like some people that follow/cover our sport. 
10//2! 
And watching The Horns. Hook 'em! 
w/ and 
Got up early and swam 3500 yds then 3 hrs on the bike. Then bonked. #rookiemove 
Walked out this am to get the paper(s) and, dare I say, it was actually "cool". #finally 
love it! 
Just had pizza at Homeslice here in Austin w/ & Love that place. Great to see Rae there too. 
Launching today equipment now available at Get fit and show your support. 
please wish him my best. 
Anyone else in Austin, TX looking outside, seeing those dark clouds building, and saying please rain ?!?!? 
no doubt. I would gladly get my ass handed to me by Terry Fox. 
Happy birthday to Dr Larry Einhorn! Thanks for all you do including, uh, saving my life as well as hundreds of thousands others. #hero 
Humbled by all of you who have pledged to #wearyellow on #livestrongday. Thank you!!! 
Damn, wish i woulda been here...  
If anyone has any information on Mark Bosworth please check out these links
 
Our friends at are in the running to win a donation from  Please #vote. 
Important stuff. Please read.  
Beautiful hike up to American Lake with today. #perfectday  
Listening to the Nirvana Town Hall on Sirius Lithium hosted by Jon Stewart. 20 yr anniversary since the release of Nevermind! 
And speaking of incredible sporting performances - Patrick Makau runs (and new WR) 2:03:38 in the Berlin Marathon. That's 4:43 per mile!! 
Congrats to for the incredible win today at the World Championships! 
Up early here in headed to the ride for Excited to be able to help out. Great people and a great mission. 
Thank you to all the volunteers today who helped w/ Wouldn't be possible w/o you all! 
Well that was HARD! Much respect to all the competitors today And a big thanks to all the volunteers as well. 
Just dropped my run gear at T2 for Shit! What am I forgetting?!? And I left visor there too.. 
Get well soon Jake!! RT Jake Burton has cancer, and that sucks.  
My Superfly for tomorrow. Thanks for designing a killer machine!  
Just had a good chat w/ Jay from Talking (+), (-), and of course, Kona.. 
happy bday! 
Fun dinner tonight at Campo w/ and So blessed to live in 
and the old man was pushing you too. 
In the theme of "news we've all heard before" - Kelly Slater practically has #11 wrapped up! 
Honored 2 b mentioned alongside Paul Farmer by Pres Clinton at CGI 2day re: global NCD fight. Thx team & all our gr8 partners! 
Why does it feel like an April day? 
Back in 4 crazy days - 2 turning 40 (debauchery) then 2 at the UN fighting NCDs globally. Time to try and focus on 
Was just told my RT re: the Classic was inaccurate. Should have said Sunday. Saturday = 
Walking on-stage soon for Social Good Summit. Being interviewed w/ by Streaming live - mashable.com/sgs. 
#fightlikehell billboard at 34th and 7th here in NYC. #Livestrong  
BIG Day! Addressing the on #NCDs this AM. is streaming here:  Honored and humbled. 
good to see y'all out there. I was with my idol 
Speaking on a panel 4pm EST today ”Delivering Hope: Cancer Care in the Developing World”  #NCDs #UN   
Wishing a speedy recovery! 
Had a blast doing the #fightlikehell run here in NYC. Thanks to everyone who came out. Have a great night. 
Running a few mins late for the #fightlikehell run. Traffic is insane in the city! 
What I'm sayin'..  
If last night was any indication then tonight will absolutely be off the hook. Thanks to my bud for coming to rock n roll for us. 
Hey Livestrong NYC, change of plans "Fight Like Hell" The Run now 59th & CPW (the Globe). Be there Sunday at 6. #fightlikehell 
Thinking about and hoping his surgery went well. Livestrong Clint!! 
Hey NYC! - how bout a "Fight Like Hell" Twitter Run? Meet at Nike Town (57th St) 6pm this Sunday. 4-5 miles thru the city. #fightlikehell 
Of course I have. 
This is the kind of reunion I like! + Verizon = #kindofabigdeal  
And oh yeah, I'd like to be the top finisher w/ hair on their legs. Not sure I can do that though! 
Lots of ?'s abt in a week's time & my expectations. I'm going out 2 have a good time, enjoy the course, & support the event. 
for sure. Or fredericksburg. 
Whoooo!!! 
and one to 
So proud of my good friend E White. I love his work.  
oh yeah? 
Hot and hard 80 mile ride today w/ James "Seabiscuit" Selman, the BK Broiler, and Morris "The Reverend" Denton. 
Your chance to get your face in Times Square:  #FaceUptoIt #NCDs   
You think this is gonna be a party? I'm going for it since I'm a third of the way there.  
Heading down to catch the show. Can't wait. 
Uh... Michele, I'm gonna side w/ the docs on this one.  
hang in there Charlie. 
Going to Be sure 2 drop by & make a donation for our neighbors affected by the fires in Central Texas.   
UN Sec Gen: Will you hold world leaders accountable for outcomes of #UNSummit on #NCDs? #save36millionlives #asktheSG   
haha!! 
Thanks!!! RT Oct 30th Malibu Gran Fondo to benefit Livestrong  
now that is funny. thanks for coming out. 
Congrats to on winning the Jr World Triathlon Champs in honor of Kevin McDowell . Inspiring story.  
Watching SF vs Seattle. Ted Ginn Jr back to back TD's and he's rocking the yellow band. Sweet! Thanks Ted! 
and 
McCoy/Shipley the sequel. 
good luck to him 
Helluva sports day. 3hr ride, Federer vs No-joke-a-vich, fball game, Nadal vs Murray, and now the Horns vs BYU. #hookem 
He was deeply appreciative of the thought and said he's looking fwd to hosting us soon! Keep these folks in your thoughts. 
Just off the phone w/ Bastrop Mayor Terry Orr. The mayor asked we wait a coupla weeks 4 Twitter Ride Bastrop as his resources are stretched. 
hmmm. Not a bad idea. 
thank god. Gimme the 400 frees and you're going down young man. 
back next week. Let's rock. 
Just did the math on this week's travel. Austin-SF-Maui-SF-Ogden-Calgary-Montreal-Austin equals 9559 nautical miles. All in 6 days. #whew 
Just did the math on this week's travel. Austin-SF-Maui-SF-Ogden-Calgary-Montreal-Austin equals 9559 nautical miles. All in 6 days. #whew 
thanks for coming out. 
took a peruse through yours. Not exactly enthralling. Sucks getting old I guess. 
that was 
I'm thinking it's time for a twitter ride in #Bastrop. This wknd. Stay tuned here for details. Let's get out and help our neighbors. 
I agree. Just waiting. The 3rd one will be awfully fun to pen.. 
Ajax Tavern. 
Wishing Bruce Hildenbrand a speedy recovery. 
Taking off for home - Austin here we come. Got cranked in honor of a great few days in Canada. Thank you and Merci! 
Great to meet tonight here in Montreal. Good luck this season. #alwayson 
Bonjour Montreal! 
who's he? 
great question! Prob something from Maiden or DIO. 
Been listening to an advanced copy of latest "Ashes & Fire". Do I wait, Save Me, Dirty Rain. Loving it. 
true 
Gr8 night here in Calgary. Thanks to Trish and everyone for the great work they're doing. And a special thx to John Dielwart too! 
thanks! Love your place. 
Wrote an op-ed for today's Please check it out.  #Livestrong 
Great dinner tonight w/ here in Calgary. Nick, thanks for supporting and carrying the flag. 
wouldn't be the first... 
I would have killed to see that. Love Cold Springs. 
Wassup Calgary? Excited to be here and help out They are doing great work. 
and had better watch out! btw, don't miss the last seconds of the commentary. classic.  
get well and good luck! 
and that TSA dude nearly tasered your ass! Safe travels. 
Wishing the best of luck. Glad cancer was caught early. The 28mil are behind you in your fight. #LIVESTRONG 
yes it is! 
New report by “Delivering Hope”  Strategies for delivering care in developing world #NCDs 
Another excellent workout this am. put the hurt on me tho. 
How I passed my time from Maui to SFO.  
Headed back to the mainland from Maui.. Thinking about all the people of Central Texas off my mind. Hope everyone is keeping safe. 
not this trip. Soon though. 
Great kickoff tonight for Club Excellence event here in Maui. Honored to share the stage w/ Andre Agassi and Brad Webb. 
The good news is I'm in Maui. Bad news is it's only for a day. 
Exciting news!! Looking forward to winning some races!  
so sorry to hear that. Be strong. 
Thinking about everyone being affected by the fires in Austin. Hang in there and stay safe! 
Crazy week of travel this week. SF, Napa, Maui, Utah, Calgary, Montreal. #wakingupnotknowingwhereiam 
sorry man, off to Maui now. Next time! 
Great bike ride in the Napa Valley w/ Love the roads around here. 
Met 2 Dutch guys this am at the coffee shop. They reminded me this weekend is the Ride For The Roses in Holland. #LIVESTRONG 
I could 4 of em 'bout right now. 
Hard wo this morning. you were missed. 
Up early in SF. Bout to go break a sweat. Dio's "Rainbow In The Dark" on the radio. Long live DIO. 
that's for sure. 
absolutely. The kids loved it. 
got one on right this minute. 
cool! Gotta love 
thank you. Exceeded everyone's expectations. 
Fun nt w/ & Papa Ed! 
record time even in the snow! 
Good ride out of this morning with the crew. 
I'd love to but I'll be throwing a few back celebrating 40. 
no. Coulda been tho. 
Ryan Adams covers Iron Maiden. Hell yeah.  
you bet, again, I loved the film. 
Nobody jumps out of a car quite as fast as a 6th grade kid when you pull up right in front of the school. #dadyoureembarrassingme 
absolutely! 
like usual 
you bet my man. Been a pleasure having you on board. Best of luck. 
need to bring 'er back 
Early am ride out of Rode down towards the Austin classic "Tuesday Nighter". We still doing that around here? 
they have short memories I guess 
Just found out that cute avatar pic for is a fake. FG, what is it they say over there? I'm "gutted".. #sayitaintso 
That's ridiculous. I'm glad I was so "neglected". #thanksmom 
heck yeah, that's what I'm talking about! 
Yes! Go Team Mama Grizzly RT please show some love, how about a rt 4 a friend w/ osteosarcoma?! go team mama grizzly bear! 
have a 6th 
uh, not a damn thing. 
comeback 3.0? 
Sunset over Lake Austin.  
wow, the "lost" juan and the mona lisa. Awesome. 
Questions about #NCDs. Stands for non communicable diseases. Heart and lung disease, diabetes and cancer. 
60% of all deaths worldwide are caused by #NCDs. We need to make global health a priority.  #FaceUpToIt 
Great set of meetings up Awesome stuff happening. I love our team! 
haven't thought of it. Until now. Nov 5? 
My friend has a smart, engaging documentary that will make u think. 9p tonight. "The Last Heart Attack" 
Can't wait to get back to Austin tomorrow...RT We've tied the all-time hottest temperature in Austin today at 112!! 
Tough day out at the #PowerOfFour. Took a nasty digger on one of govt trails rock gardens. DNF for me today. Congrats 2 on the win! 
I can. And can half it if you want. 
#nowplaying Midlakes' "Acts of Man" 
and descend.. 
you'd be fine homey. 
sure I do. What u got? 
Back to Racing Power Of 4 tomorrow. is 100 miles and 10,000 ft climbing. Power of 4 is 31 miles and 11,000 ft! #ouch 
only way to do it. 
In Toronto reading about Jack Layton's amazing attitude as he battled cancer. RIP. #LIVESTRONG #HOPE 
Oops, meant to put "eh" at the end. Sorry, eh. 
Great ride today here in the Waterloo region benefiting Thanks to all the riders! More than a million dollars raised! 
and it's mutual. 
Thank you sir! RT same with 24HoB. Still raised 220k for Livestrong and Ulman Fund. 
haha, just said that. Too funny. 
Canada, eh? 
livestrong.org 
Higs and I en route to Kitchener/Waterloo. Pearl Jam's version of "Crazy Mary" on Sirius' Lithium. One of my all time favorites. 
Congrats to and all of on the win at Poitou-Charentes!! 
no doubt. Hang in there. Let us know how we can help. 
trying to make it. 
haha!! 
Wynter Gordon? 
does it count if I said it to his face? 
6am! 
Bike designed and signed by my friend up for auction to benefit Check it out!  
Wow. That was a badass bike race right there. Congrats to Levi. 
Amazing ride by Will it be enough? 
Please join me in Sunday September 25th for the 2nd annual Wapiyapi Classic. www.wapiyapiclassic.org benefiting 
Storm clouds rolling into Hope it stays dry for the Decent down Independence could be sketchy. 
best of luck. 
Cancer is a global crisis. Join and tell world leaders to #FaceUpToIt #NCDs  
i'm one of your biggest fans. always have been. 
Cervelo didn't pay their bills? 
Damn, I love it when emails with good ideas. 
what's better than being back in When is jamming in the house. And they are in ATX tomorrow! oops. 
terrible 
Great day Biz Summit. Congrats to all the award winners and THANK YOU for all you do helping Record wk last week!! 
I'm Dallas - Aspen. Love going from 107 to 72. Can't wait to see the up close tomorrow! 
Congrats Levi and everyone on RT And your stage 1 winner is 
boat 
This is what the Austin F1 track looks like today.  
Happy birthday to and 
chicken tacos and a coupla cold beers was on the diet last night. Like to new set up. 
damn, I should have known that was it. Thanks for the insight. 
Bill Woodul would have loved seeing this race today in the Springs. I miss that guy. 
Watching the prologue of the on So proud to see this dream finally become a reality. 
Just ran 6 here in ATX. I literally felt like I was going to melt. Inhumane temps. 
Ur welcome!RT thx 4 donating yr signed Tour de France jersey 4 R event.  
manana? 
we'll do it again in '12. I'll start training now. 
Quite a few ?'s about why I'm in TX and not in CO. 2morrow is 1st day of school 4 my kids so I'm here! Up 2 CO Tues night. 
me neither 
Great riding w/ the guys from today. Those boys were hammerin'. 
Yes! RT An amazing and inspiring #LSCPhilly weekend. 5,200 participants from 42 states & 8 countries, 30,000 donations. 
ditto 
no doubt. Dang, I was suffering at the end. 
4:15 
haven't invested much time thinking about it. Sorry, I have no insight! 
Headed back to TX w/ College, Higs, and others. #tripledigittemps! 
Now that put the challenge in the Livestrong Challenge. Holy moly, that course was hard! Thx to everyone who participated. 
hardly ever 
Thanks to for coming tonight as well. 
Great night here in Philly for the Challenge dinner. Love the passion in the room. Thx to for being there! 
Listening to the lastest from It's damn good. 
100 miles 
In the middle of the BoD mtg. Talking cancer navigation as well as the upcoming UN special assembly on non-communicable disease. 
Thinking about and wishing her the best! #LIVESTRONG 
you'll be missed Junior. 
En route to Philly for the challenge tomorrow. Looking fwd to it. 
Hilarious dinner tonight w/ and College tonight Tyson is the man. 
Untitled  
sure, sell them but don't compromise other peoples health. The science on this is irrefutable. 
I disagree.  
Congrats and Rahna on the new arrival! 
Proud of the Alamo City. San Antonio goes smoke-free today. Next up, the whole State of TX. 
Seeing my buddy at the Saxon Pub here in ATX. He's here recording his new album. 
it was incredible. Terribly sad ending as we all know. He's missed by millions that will surely jump after watching this. 
zero. And yes, he tends to do that. 
Great to be back in Austin, Texas. Except for the thing on the dash that says 104!! 
racing for free will do that to some races. 
Watching Loving it. The man defined intensity. Thanks for passing it along. #SENNA 
damn good question 
Check out new video. Beautifully shot.  
you're right. I've been flaking. I'll get back on it. 
Mad? No. Amused? Yes. 
Seriously? 
or le deux? 
absolutely here for the stage. Should be a great week of racing at the 
The Challenge in Philly is this weekend. I’ll be there w/ my buddy Who’s joining us? #LSCPhilly 
agreed. Sorry, was in/out. Raincheck, uh, I mean next time. 
My son just shoved/snorted a piece of pasta up his nose. What now? 
My son just shoved/snorted a piece of pasta up his nose. What now? 
wish him our best and let us know if we can help. 
I'd love to but already back in 
Great day of meetings here on the Nike campus going over the entire collection. Thanks to you all for supporting us! 
where did you send it? Dying to watch it! 
Landing in Portland and, holy shit, it's not raining. Awesome! 
Happy birthdau 
Classic video of winning today in Guadalupe.  Hits the deck and continues "posting up". Love it!!! 
Classic video of winning today in Guadalupe.  Hits the deck and continues "posting up". Love it!!! 
tell them we say hi and miss them. 
Congrats to on finishing the #LT100. Harder than swimming?? 
FACT. 
Congrats to envoy on his Indy Car victory today! 
Congratulations 2 4 winning the And to for finishing 3rd. Another gr8 result for 
Just knocked out a 60 mile ride w/ College in rainy Aspen. #halfwheeledhisass 
Thoroughly enjoyed Larry Hagman's TALK in today's NYT mag. 
Glad some of the team got to visit with Dr. Paul Farmer today in ATX. We are proud to be partners with 
casper? 
depends where u start from. Plus the non-paved part is very, very hard for a road bike. 
That's right RT Pink lemonade chews = yum. 
Congrats to the crew. 70 days, 4500 miles, Austin to Anchorage. Thanks to each and everyone of you for your commitment and passion! 
thanks! 
 we want video. 
Nice! Great spot. 
he needs to know what's best! 
Good luck to all the riders doing the Leadville 100 tomorrow. Belt buckles all around! 
Good luck to you all riding for Gonna be a great ride tomorrow!  
Top of Snowmass Mtn (11,600 ft). Ouch.  
nasty, isn't it? 
Congrats on winning the TT at the Eneco Tour. Go 
On the phone w/ talking He's headed up to Alaska to ride the final day w/ the crew tomorrow. Very cool. 
Just went for a short mtb ride w/ Smuggler, iowa, 4 corners, hobbit. #talkingleadville 
Happy birthday 
Happy Birthday  
Trying to make it. Looking likely. I love Marfa and bikes and hate cancer. 
Great story about my man  
good job cuz 
she did. Thanks! 
Great few days here in Nantucket. Our first time here but not our last.. Off to Wisconsin now! 
Happy Birthday  
I got your back. 
Great day in Nantucket w/ friends and family. 
Sad news RT RIP Dr. Bernadine Healy. You were a true leader in our fight. Honored to know you. #LIVESTRONG 
incredible story. That's what I call living strong. 
Shocked & saddened to hear about the tragedy today in Afghanistan where 31 SEALS lost their lives. My deepest condolences 2 their families. 
complete! 111 miles of kicking cancer's ass w/ a peloton 5000 strong. Loved it. Thx to all for coming out! 
Wishing a speedy recover to Rich Wolter! Got banged up in a crash in Central Park. 
savin' weight. 
Incredible day on the beach here in #nantucket. Now headed over for Can't wait!! 
If you’re at the today in Sturbridge, stop by and visit our friend at the booth from 3-6pm. 
Thanks for stopping by! 
6am?!? 
Any masters swimming in Nantucket? 
fun makin' you suffer a little. haha! 
Congrats to “One of America's Best Places to Work”- 2yrs in a row  
1. Good luck w/ the heat 2. 3. 4. Deep Eddy or Barton Springs 
they still have advertisers? 
yes, been mostly on the Superfly as of late. Lovin' it. Nice work 
Check out Trent Bona's awesome pics from yesterday's race.  
Thanks to the Crested Butte Alpine Odyssey MTB race yesterday I now feel like I've been run over by a truck. 
riding the 100 
Hello August. Already? 
At Teocali Tamale having a big ol' spicy chicken burrito. ZZ Top on the radio. Good combo. 
Helluva fun ride today in CB for the qualifier. Beautiful course. Squeaked out a "W" somehow. Full body cramp at the end. 
been wondering the same. I hear rumors he's not dead tho. Stay tuned. 
Thanks to everyone at the Gourmet Noodle here in Crested Butte. Food was delicious and service was great. 
balls? You mean ball right? 
At dinner here in CB w/ and crew. Better eat some pasta so I can survive tomorrow. 
So I hear tomorrow is the final qualifier for the (in CB). Some say why, I say why not. I'll be there. Taking it easy tho! 
Thinking about heading over to Crested Butte tomorrow w/ to do some mtb'ing. How are the trails over there? 
thank you!! 
We hit our goal of 100K signatures on the Open Letter. Keep forwarding to friends/family.  #NCD #LIVESTRONG 
wow. stay classy charles. 
Great story, Gil.  Thinking of you and your dad. #LIVESTRONG 
Looking forward to speaking tomorrow night. Talking TdF, cycling, cancer, etc. 
flat ones. 
Just off the bike w/ here in Good ride and great to catch up all things 
And psyched to be riding w/ as well. Take it easy on us Senator. 
Excited to be riding w/ all of you. Been trying to get there for years! Riding bikes and kicking cancer's ass. 
Pre-ride shot w/ part of team in front of the school bus!  
I will be there this year. 
I like it! 
Fun day on the bike here at #RAGBRAI. It's an amazing sight seeing 1000's of people on bikes! 
wins 4th stage of Tour of Wallonie!! 
Congrats to cancer survivor for signing with the 
Congrats to cancer survivor for signing with the 
Just passed a billboard for the Dutch Oven Bakery here in Boone, Iowa. #classic 
#nowplaying Ryan Adams' "Oh My Sweet Carolina" w/ incredible backing vocals from Emmylou Harris. 
#RAGBRAI, here we come! 
welcome back Sgt Tony fox! 
Trading stories with about TDF.  Hey what was your favorite moment #WhenInFrance? 
Looking fwd to passing through Iowa and riding #RAGBRAI w/ team Tuesday Carroll to Boone!! 
Beautiful morning here in Paris. 
he showered? 
Congratulations to Cadel Evans. #thatwasademonstration 
Made it to Grenoble. Gonna be one helluva a race today. 
Thinking about all those in Oslo affected by today's tragic events. 
Last thing, 70% chance of rain tomorrow. . . This could be a real factor. 
The TT is also on the "short side" at 41km. It's a toss up. I'm looking fwd to being in Grenoble and seeing some great bike racing. 
But don't forget TT last year. Impressive. AND he's in yellow tomorrow -worth more than a few seconds. 
4 those asking - no idea what is going to happen tomorrow. Basically 3 guys racing for the overall. On paper Cadel should be able to do it.. 
If you thought the Pyrenees were boring (I admit, so did I) then the boys are making up for it yesterday and today! 
Hats off to Cadel as well. To say he's doing all the work would be an understatement. He's hammering. 
Watching the #tourdefrance. Gutsy and smart riding by and his team. Fun to watch. 
less so now. Losing precious seconds. 
Gr8 ride up the #ventoux today w/ Chechu, & others!! Never gets easier. 
Great to see my friend and trusted former lieutenant Chechu!!  
Do you believe cancer should be a global priority? Prove it. Sign on for the 28mil.  Sign & RT 
Tuesday 
Happy 93rd birthday to Nelson Mandela! 
don't worry, he's flying out in a minute. 
Thanks to everyone at Skibo Castle for such an amazing time. We'll never forget it. 
Thank you Joe Sakic. Your hole in one at #ACCGolf means a 500k donation to 
And a special thanks to the local police for their help! 
Thanks Scotland for coming out for a little ride. To the 1000+ who came over Dornoch - you rock! Keep ridin'.. 
En route to Dornoch! 
Scottish wake up call.  
Ride don't fly.  
Best of luck Sunday to Team USA and athlete #USWNT 
not 
Alright Scotland - it's on. Twitter ride! Meet 5pm tomorrow (Sunday) in Dornoch (Sutherland County) at The Eagle Pub. 30 mile loop. 
Is Monday a holiday in #Scotland? I feel a #twitterride coming on. 
Lastly, the dude knows how to suffer. Will be fun to watch. Enjoy. 
He keeps them close on Alpe d'Huez. His teammate Pierre Rolland has been a rockstar and has to continue to be. 
He has 2:06 on Evans. Final TT is 42km. He's French. It's the Tour de FRANCE. He won't lose 2:06 in the final time trial ASSUMING... 
He wasn't "swinging off the back" 2day. He was 1 of the strongest. The others weren't assertive and/or aggressive enough 2 make a selection. 
Lots of ?'s on Voeckler's chances for overall victory in Paris.... my thoughts. 
If Voeckler makes it to the top w/ the leaders today then we have to say he can win the TdF. He's got 2 mins and they can't shake him. 
A whopping 3 holes of golf now watching the climb to Plateau deBeille. It's a doozy.  
Nice 35 mile ride in/around the County of Sutherland. Small roads, no cars, and beautiful terrain. 
Ambien and email don't mix. Woke up to see I had emailed around asking if Jimmy Page would come to my birthday party. Oops. 
Well, we made it to Inverness. Beautiful day here. 
Here we come! We cannot wait to see Scotland.  
What's better than an email from Willie Nelson? An email from Willie showing me this...  
Thanks for hosting the ACC Golf Tourney this weekend benefiting  #ACCGolf 
hell yes it is. 
I'll be there! 
Wondering how the riding is in Inverness, Scotland. 
Congrats and on your new addition!!! 
I've never seen the #TdF like this! Follow & let 'em know what you do #WhenInFrance 
Dear - thanks for the special gift. Love, Lance  
Also heard the event tonight was a massive success. Congrats ladies!! 
On the phone w/ who's helping us w/ a cool new project. Stay tuned! 
fact II 
fact 
Covers that better the original. doing "Wonderwall" and w/ "I can't make you love me" come to mind. 
Please read and please sign on!  
yours truly 
Same flowers, same month, different part of the world.  
Check out 92 yr old Georgia! She's riding her stationary bike 100 miles today LSC Davis!!  
But getting off the bike and hearing about mass carnage at the #TDF is not good. I feel for the fellas over there. Hang in there guys. 
Great ride this am at the challenge. Thx #Davis for all your support! 
DJing in the Google+ room. Come hang out. Now playing Gorillaz: M1 A1 ♫♪ #turntablefm  
DJing in the Google+ room. Come hang out. Now playing The Black Keys: Tighten Up ♫♪ #turntablefm  
Great to be in Northern California for the Challenge in Davis tomorrow! 
Big shout out to for their heroic commitment in the fight against prostate cancer. Thanks Dr. Senft!!! 
be there tomorrow. looking fwd to it. 
definitely the latter. 
More bad luck for First Jani and now Wishing them a speedy recovery. Go Klodi! 
Land art. From 40,000 ft.  

i've been saying that for a long time. 
interesting... then let's address the carbon aero wheels. Faster and terrible braking. #badcombo 
Happy 4th of July to you all. And a special thanks to the brave men and women serving our country today and in the past. 
Congrats to Tyler Farrar on his fiirst TdF stage win! Surely a special win for him. #W 
Hey America, happy birthday eve.  
Our panel from yesterday's is up now. #aspenideas  
Great round of golf w/ President Clinton here in Aspen. Talked alot about CGI and Livestrong.  
Congrats to my bud Thor. Swapping the rainbow for yellow. Not bad. 
And congrats to on winning stage 1 in the Tour of Austria! 
Good luck in the TTT today! I'm predicting a win for the team and yellow for #we'llsee 
Listening to Sid Mukherjee and David Agus talk about the future of the cancer fight #AspenIdeas 
On top of the Ute w/ He made it! Thanks to you all for coming out!  
Just finished the panel Great discussion amongst the group. #aspenideas 
Psyched 2 hear & are n for the UTE hike. Cory talking some trash but I'm confident I can take him. 
y'all in? 
you all in?? 
Looking fwd 2 our panel tomorrow 4 #AIF. How bout a little "twitter hike" post panel?? 11am base of the Ute. Who's in?? 
Next weekend is Challenge Davis. Looking forward to a great ride! Come join me.  
Great dinner last night house. cool to be w/ Gerry Hosier, and others. #bigbrains 
We thought for sure we were the first ones up high this season. #apparentlynot  
Killer mtb ride w/ this am. Aspen - Chaparral - Mt. Yeckel - Lenado - 4 corners - Aspen. I'm cooked. 
And to all my friends and family in Texas - I love you but I have to tell you I'm a little chilly sitting out here... 
Back on CO. Sitting on the patio with talking all things Gr8 stuff happening! 
RIP Ron Smith -- one of the original Ironmen. 
Fun ride up the Bells w/ Tim of and some buddies. Post ride at Woody Creek. #beersandburgers  
Happy Birthday 
as in both. 
Watched Riding Giants last night w/ and Higs. Damn. 
I miss Jim Owens. 
I miss Jim Owens. 
Here’s a link to write your senator in support of a  #txlege 
Call your senators to support a (SB28). Found out a vote could happen tomorrow. Let’s do this! #txlege 
Have some fun ridin Robbie Ventura's inaugural Gran Fondo on the proposed 2016 Olympic course, July 31 - Blue Mound, WI  
True legend passes on. Thoughts go out to Bruce and entire E Street Band.  
Great story of young men and women believing in themselves and pulling off the extraordinary.  
Powerful piece written by board member Please read.  
And still today...  
Stigma and misperceptions about cancer in many countries 
thinking about racing the weekly series tonight for fun. comeback 3.0? #not 
yes!!!  
Run 26.2 in honor of the #28million living with cancer at the  
RIP Laura. We will all miss you. 
Mavericks!!! 
and I on the new trail built on the old Droste property. Just opened and it's sweet! gets photo ...  
Great 4 hr mtb ride with and Views weren't badeither.  
For those going out for a ride this morning. Read this then pedal harder.  #perspective 
100 miles done here at the Harpeth River ride,great event. Thanks to all the riders and for having us out. 
Here in KC for the opening of Thanks Excited to be your partner. 
On the phone w/ from Going over the Nike business. Glad to hear things are rocking. Thanks Nick!! 
And the winner is...  We are excited for the survivors in your community! Congrats! 
New Nike Chosen spot featuring athlete 
Gotta love  
See you on opening night! Sporting KC player Omar Bravo joins the fight against cancer as LIVESTRONG Global Envoy  
Happy Birthday 
Help in their effort to provide comfort, treatment & hope to millions of kids –
visit  
Use #Survivors in your tweet in honor of Ntl Cancer Survivors Day. and support the 28mil  
Kids from the hood selling lemonade to benefit Thanks kids!!  
I will be at all of the Challenges! 
Picking up and Schools out for summer!! 
I'll be there. 
Happy birthday 
Come run my hometown and make a difference for the 28 million living with cancer. 2/19/12  
Is it just me or does Bosh look a little like Snoop Dogg? 
Who won the NBA Finals in 1999? 
MVP 
and from 
well, not exactly. 
we gotta figure this out Clint. 
Now gonna sit down and watch the NBA Finals. #gomavs 
Having Elem school graduation party at the house. Thirty 5th graders ripping around. Thx for helping out! 
love it! 
Last day 2 vote in the Community Impact Project.  Let's make a difference & help our fellow survivors 
Vacations are great but there's always something special about getting back home! 
thank you very much from all of us 
sorry we missed you down here brother. Safe travels. 
since '96. 
Just played 8 holes of golf. Now at the 9th hole - our version of the "19th hole". 
At Flora Farms near San Jose del Cabo. This place is unreal. Don't come to Cabo and not come here! 
Heading to Cabo for big 3 - 0 bash. Ruh roh. Gotta love Baja. 
Congrats to and AG on the birth of Clara Jane! Doug, life won't ever be the same my friend. 
I will but I think he's in Mexico then. 
Gonna be a big day for and AG!!! 
May 25, nearly 8pm, 98 degrees (and humid) in Austin. #damn 
Austin has in fact. This is a state-wide initiative. 
EVERYONE has the right to breathe clean air. Help make Texas smoke free!  #txlege Please RT 
Ride with Gonna be a great ride.  
great question. i think i know the answer. 
Birthday date night w/ Perfect!!! (And it was Tango Tuesday!) 
Happy Birthday The big 3 - 0 !! 
Happy hour w/ the whole team here at the house. For those who think we'll be distracted, think again. We're here to serve. 
I definitely won't. Ever. 
Congrats to and everyone on for winning the Incredible effort. 
What I'm sayin'. Go  
Matthew Busche = MVP. 
Go Shack!!! 
Watching on The Shack Tracker. looking good! 
50 min run in the hills in/around LA. Had to put the smack down on 
Big day for here Good luck fellas! 
Meeting w/ the entire Nike team going over future concepts, messages, and designs. Stuff looks amazing. 
every second of every day. 
Congratulations to on his 3rd Olympic Gold Medal!! 
And in news from this century... there's an amazing bike race taking place in California. Thanks for supporting these amazing athletes. 
www.facts4lance.com. 
20+ year career. 500 drug controls worldwide, in and out of competition. Never a failed test. I rest my case. 
Just spoke at The Getty House w/ for the Salon Series. Talked etc. Thanks to everyone for coming out! 
Can I get a HELL YEAH for 
Beautiful day in Palo Alto. AM ride w/ then tough masters swim 
Listening to Danger Mouse's new project ROME. Man's a genius. 
Just stopped by HQ to visit w/ the team here in San Ramon. Thx for being great and passionate partners! 
Check out on the front page of cnn.com rocking his band. Thanks Senator!! 
Happy birthday 
Run, swim, shower. Taking off for NorCal and the ToC. Go 
he knows he can't handle that. 
Congrats Gail!! 
yet Donald Trump had your vote? What am I missing? 
Another! RT : My plate in PA. Live it everyday. Thanks for the inspiration!  
Awesome!! RT Caught a great license plate  
Fight cancer, look cool: 1/2 of all $$ spent at  today donated to 
40 min around the streets of #Marfa. Even looped through the Chinati Fdn property. Surreal. 
Congratulations to K. J. Choi for winning the Players Championship. And thanks for always representing w/ the band!! 
FACT. 
Nice!! 
Hanging at The Paisano w/ and #Marfa 
Hey aren't you supposed to be at the Tour of California???  
Amen 
Hey how's that Austin trip coming along? 
Delicious meal w/ at the Miniature Rooster tonight in #Marfa. First time there - highly recommended. #byob/byow 
Just heard that Ronette Espinoza passed away. So sad to hear. To Zap and Xokota, we love you. Hang in there. 
Made it to Marfa.  
Just ran the "Girls On The Run" 5k w/ my daughter She did great! 1st overall & ran nearly 8min pace. Not bad 4 a 9yr old!! 
nice! Hope you enjoy it. 
I'm getting old 
Check out the new bikes for ToC. Designed by my friend Shep Fairey. Thanks to everyone  
Great article about our Cancer Navigation Center, incluing an interview with one of our HQ office volunteers!  
like I have the right to drive 50 in a school zone? 
make sure they come back on Tango Tuesday! 
Texas!! Help out pls!!RT Urgent! Tell your State Rep. to vote yes on HB 670 and make our state healthier. #txlege #txbudget 
No doubt. Wtf? RT Best to quit smoking, but hard to do. Mr. Camilleri is on another planet:  
Thanks to the team at Lake Austin Family Dental for looking after me! 
At the dentist. Hating my life right now. 
sup? 
and best workout team around...new book "Foundation" is awesome! See basics here  
Huge storm in ATX. Finally!! 
my pick.. 
 
see you in CA! 
hardly any 
maybe cuz you're a complete douchebag.. 
w/ Going over strategic/future plans. 
has a small head according to . .  #breakfasttacosandbeer 
best of luck to you 
You can set the course of the fight against cancer in your community. Vote now!!  #LIVESTRONG 
Dude, it's all about Austin. RT I'm done with Boulder. 
39 actually. 
anniv party has turned into a keg stand contest. Who wants some?? 
From all of us 3 years and going strong. Thank you!!!  
3 yr anniversary at the house tonight. Best shop and best staff anywhere!! Appreciate all that make it happen. 
A donation page has been setup by Leopard Trek for Wouter’s family.  Please take a look.  
Congrats to of for winning Best Chef: Southwest at the Beard Awards  
I'm busted. 
announce summer tour.  Gotta hit one of these dates. thoughts? 
Just back from a run and got the news of Wouter Weylandt's death today in the Giro. I'm shocked and saddened. May he rest in peace. 
For all you Michael Bolton fans out there.  
Someone just pointed me to a blog about bourbon and pork. #useless 
I'm still partial to my top fuel (26) but the writing is on the wall. 29'ers are the future. 
tested both. Actually 3. 26, 29 dual, 29 hard tail. 
Mothers Day brunch then a few hot laps at ranch. #damngoodday 
Happy Mothers Day!! 
Grilling out on Mothers Day Eve in Austin w/ and 
and I wanna #meetclint. 
I now need to see the FILM Animal Kingdom. I was referring to the HORSE. 
Animal Kingdom! 
Great start to the #Giro for 
Congratulations to all the High Point University graduates! Thanks for having me! Keep livin' strong. 
Sad to hear about the passing of Seve Ballesteros. May he RIP. 
yes 
you invited the 3 month boys trip to Cabo? 
Just looked at my phone and realized I "pocket dialed" Miguel Indurain at home at about 3pm today. #doh 
Awesome. RT View from stage where will speak to High Point University grads tomorrow  
Just landed in North Carolina. Excited to give the commencement High Point University tomorrow. 
Thinking about Jenny Conlee. 
Thanks  
Benefit tonight for folks affected by W. Tx fires: Patty Griffin, Shawn Colvin, Amy Cook & David Garza, Heartless Bastards 
7 mile run around Lady Bird Lake w/ Another great day in Austin. 
guess the cat and a few of the writers there have some things in common. 
yeah? i'm here. 
Dear NFL owners and GM's, here's your man. His name is  
Great to see my buddy in ATX tonight. He's here supporting - helping survivors afford school! 
I will be riding IN cali but not IN the 
you know where to get it, right??? 
congrats!!! 
I’m honoring my mom for #MothersDay on    
Help Please sign the pledge...  
Don't forget your trip to Austin. 
Thank you RT Supporting Zap this weekend at Las Vegas #SX #support  
Great lunch at 34th St Cafe w/ Doug Brinkley. One of the most interesting people around. 
can't wait myself! 
Happy birthday to Jack Higgins!! 
position on  
have to agree w/ your last point. 
Ronette on my mind. 
Hung w/ tonight. 
Heading out to the show. How about this Austin sky tonight? 
Heitz 
oh shit, she's pissed now. I'm reading your response. Haha! #not 
Date night w/ Love this place. Chicken Milanese is insane tonight. #byow 
Amazing! RT cngrts 2 Eric Abidal: diagnosed w/ cancer 2 months ago & played n Champions League semi-final 2nite. #Livestrong 
Good luck 
Lots of responses w/ varying fuel prices around the world. Some upwards of 10 bucks a gallon. So 
amongst a lot of other things... 
Now on display Come check it out!  
Gas is nearly 4 bucks a gallon. Time to 
FINALLY raining in Austin. #lanina 
Fascinating read.  
without a doubt. Best wishes. 
Cheering for Mark Herzlich. Never give up!  
no doubt. I've witnessed first hand the coalition at work. Thx to all our partners. 
Was trying 2 follow all the news coverage ths am but had other plans so we're now watchin Dora The Explorer. #whatadifference 
USA USA USA!! 
Finally... 
they'd forgive you. Let's hear it. 
tough to explain that in 140 characters. 
Hello cold (actually cool) front!! 
Is it really already May? 
wow. Didn't see any of that today. Thank goodness. 
congrats to all who completed #nyc5borobiketour. Special thanks to team 
Back in ATX. Bummed to miss the dog is racing in the weiner dog races so, uh, dachsunds over dirt today. 
Going to the White House Correspondents Dinner tonight. Honored to be sitting w/ my good friend 
thanks for recognizing us. We still have a lot of work to do. 
Happy Birthday to Willie Nelson. 
Napa Valley Reserve? 
awesome! She's the best. 
Just watched doc "Back and Forth". Totally f-ing badass. #grohlforprez 
Good luck to everyone in town for the this wknd ranch. 
6:30 - 7:00 
good luck. Make sure to seek the best care possible. Check out www.livestrong.org if u get a minute. Lots of help there. 
went for the beer instead 
Huge congrats to Dale Parker for winning the TT Great win for !!! 
Sneak peek. My new Structure Triax that's coming to my Nike Livestrong collection. Love this running shoe.  
6 mile run around the 'hood. Shot some Nike LS footage as well. Beautiful day in ATX. 
7002 
incredible! I'll be at my daughter's weiner dog races since you asked. Night before WH Corr dinner w/ your Mayor. Thank u! 
7000... 
Indeed it is RT Hey Austin, Mopac is efffffffed! 
Thinking of and his family today. So sorry for your loss. 
Riding in Lajitas today w/ Ken Butler. The guy has some mad skills too. Check out the shock used on his prosthetic arm.  
And thanks to for coming out and entertaining all of us and 
Amazing ride in Big Bend w/ True heroes!! And lemme tell ya, they can hammer! 
In Lajitas, TX ready to ride w/ a group from Can't wait. #heroes 
Left Vegas and headed to visit w/ some true heroes of mine. Can't wait. 
Just spoke SGM conference. Huge supporters of the Nike Livestrong collection. Thanks to you all! 
Well, got to sleep in my own bed for a night. Up early and off to Lost Wages, oops, I mean Las Vegas. 
Hmmm. bn thr. RT Any1 who says they know exactly wht's going 2 happen nxt in the NFL labor battle is either lying or stupid. 
Hey #NP's Only 48hrs left to apply 4 funding. Go to  today! Please apply and RT. 
In Marfa w/ Mumford and Sons and a few thousand friends.  
butt tweet? 
is playing quite the host tonight. Hey Liz, let's make a habit of this, ok? 
New stuff from  
Congratulations! 
Marfa misses THE TANK. 
Mornin' from Marfa. Happy Easter to you all. 
you bet. Keep it up. 
En route to Marfa. 
Thanks to Hunter Brooks and his family for swinging by 
I still can't believe did it! 
Rancho Pelota 
been discussed. Stay tuned. 
Congratulations 
high and tight? 
I knew it smelt like UPDOG around here. 
hey heads up! 
Fun nite at La Condessa 4 Steve & Jenna's engagement party. Highlight - meeting Steve's 93yr old grandma who still works out! Such a babe. 
she'd better be at swim workout tomorrow am. 
Well folks, he's finally arrived. Welcome to Twitter. Uh... this could get interesting. 
Just surprised Nike founder Phil Knight on the show. Great man, great friend, and an incredible supporter of Airs Tues. 
uh oh.. 
41 and rain outside. Had to divert to the hotel gym and treadmill. 
indeed i was 
short and tight! 
ring ring? 
Flying up to Chicago to see an old friend. 
I'll be there 
Powerful look back at Chris Hondros' work. One helluva brave man.  
Oh Charles, you're so clueless. 
The was named 2011 World Car of the year.  The Armstrong family could not agree more!  
he finally got it?? 
LIVESTRONG Programs at work:  LIVESTRONG at the YMCA participants go on a trek to Everest. 
I can only imagine. 
question was - "who's the CMO?" and they said LA1. Dirty secret is that the answer is also LA2. Of course LA2 is the CMoO. 
Hello Welcome to twitter. Glad the 'real thing' as arriven. #cabocabocabo (cc 
Back in #Austin. Went for a run around Town Lake. Damn, it's hot here. 
YES! 
Stunning photograph.  
Hey enjoy your holiday. 
on it 
At dinner w/ the entire team from here in #steamboat. Not sure this town is ready for this. 
gr8 BoD mtg today. Lots of exciting things coming. New chew flavors, new waffle flavors, more availablity. Thx 4 the support! 
We're on it!! RT tell them to make more waffles. And get in more shops! Meeting over. 
Hats off to you, Mr. Hartley.  Lived through cancer, two wars  and now, the Boston Marathon! 
wins again for 
Just got word that Grete Waitz has passed away. So sad to hear. She was a good friend and an incredible athlete. 
Up and at 'em early here in ATX. Quick workout then off to Steamboat for meetings. Great things happening up there. 
ouch! 
yeah, right?!? 
RIP Pietro Ferrero. 
How great is He's even helping to raise my kids! 
#IWouldTrade a few 100% Lance-powered bikes for 100% Electric-powered What would u trade  
you win 
Congratulations to 
everynight brother, every night. 
for sure 
And happy birthday to 
Happy birthday 
getting there! barely. thanks for all your help. 
no doubt. and amazing fans. 
party at the house w/ and #ohlord 
get after it!! Good luck. 
Very cool!! RT check out rabosport.nl for the special ride for the roses jersey we are going to race in tomorrow. 
thanks for the kind words. 
Good luck to everyone racing the #little500! Was there in '97. Amazing experience. Can't wait to go back one day. 
Just off the phone w/ talking about and plans for #AGR tomorrow and 
will do. They are a great couple. 
I prefer to play 6. 
we'll bring it August 21 for the challenge in philly. 
Karen!! RT One of my favorite people just chopped 17" off her hair to donate to Wigs for Kids!  
hahaha!! 
Great swing out to CA but damn it's nice to be back in #Austin. 
gracias hombre!! 
hmmm.  
made the list! What an honor:  We offer public tours every Friday at 10am - come see it for yourself. 
Holy shit, this has some fanbase. 
that was fun 
yep, that was me. 
Thanks to for your support. Great to have you on board.  
Hell. Yes. RT  
because I'm retired. Lots of free time. #not 
Cartoon's ice cream truck.  
Banksy hates Mondays  
Banksy  
install  
Will post some pics. 
Just stopped by to see the Art in the Streets exhibition. Some great (old school and new school) work by amazing artists. 
we talked a lot about the great work she's doing. 
not in 2011... 
nice!! Keep hammerin'. 
Fun lunch w/ my chill sis She gave me a long list of "to do's" tho. Sheesh. 
hang in there. We're pulling for you all. 
definitely thinking about it!! 
meanwhile, you and are late for dinner... 
just bought the new Read great things about it and so far it's all that. 
great! keep it up. 
Thanks to for an amazing massage. One of my fav LMTs around. My quads are still jacked from that trail run last wknd! 
Apply for funding today. Giving 700K to 90 #nonprofits all over the US. Apply:  
Great ride here in LA. Out thru Griffith Park towards La Canada. Great riding here. 
Great night in Springfield, MO supporting Thanks to the 1200 for coming out and supporting this great organization. 
ended up in Austin, Texas. 
Looking forward to seeing my friend and supporter Larry O'Reilly to celebrate the great work of 
Hey I don't know but I may have spotted him today in Santa Barbara.  
Great early am ride up Romero w/ Off to Missouri now! 
Good luck! RT i'm doing a charity bike ride from London 2 Pairs - It's 2 raise $$ 4 a childrens hospital 
excited to come your way. 
UCI's latest World Tour rankings are out and it's official. ranked #1! 
kona. I thought James "didn't like the beach" tho??? 
amen. Thx for coming out. 
roger that i think was your response 
roger that i think was your response 
Just bought the latest from I hear it's excellent. 
Adam Scott leading the Masters in Oakleys!! 
Just finished That was an insane amount of people on bikes. Thanks to for inviting me out. Honored to help out. 
Who's coming out to w/ me and tomorrow?? Bring it! 
I'm there. 
Evening mtb ride w/ and here in SB. 
ditto 
Grillin' out in Tupelo, Mississippi. Sort of..  
Ran race #2 in the Santa Barbara Trail Series this. Was advertised to be 8.5 miles. Felt like 20. The downhills absolutely killed me. 
How about in Tour of the Basque Country?? wins overall and 2nd. Hell yeah!! 
Start your Saturday off w/ this.  
and douchebaggery? 
Great workout w/ Thanks to everyone at SBSC! 
Cheering for We know you'll do great my friend! #livestrong 
Please come out, ride in beautiful and help support  
yes. sunday 
true, be there in a coupla weeks tho for the Mumford and Sons gig. 
Heading to one of my favorite towns in America - Santa Barbara, CA! 
Great 6 mile "jog" w/ Just coming back, right Fresh? 
I'm just glad the monkees beat the corsairs... 
Hey congrats... 
Just got my new jersey. Thanks  
I'm ready!! RT hey - I hope your 7 tour de france victories have you ready for this sundays's #cicLAvia 
Just finished riding w/ some of the fellas outta Too windy for me! 
Great example of a young adult kicking cancer's ass. player Alex Silver  #NYACAW 
no sir, Higs did. 
no Kona for me. Unless hangin out, riding bikes, and swimming w/ whales over the holidays count. 
Happy birthday to 
Anyone else in Austin, TX completely getting their asses kicked by allergies? 
eyeing the windy city for the next one. 
Cruised a 7 miler around Lady Bird Lake. Tried out the new Nike+ GPS watch. Pretty impressive. 
Don't tell Goldberg 
Good to know!! 
thanks for a great day sir. You're a true pro. See you soon. 
Ran into Tyson when on date night w/ Best sushi anywhere. Period.  
you sure about that? 
no doubt 
Shooting the cover here in #Austin for Gorgeous day. 
Honored to address the TX House from dais on Cancer Awareness Day. Thx to Jimmy Mansour for loaning me his tie #txledge 
Heading to TX Capitol for a press conference on Cancer Awareness Day in support of #txlege. 
Thanks for having us. Audience was amazing. 
homeboy was welcomed to w/ open arms. Refused to show up. #transparency 
hahahaha!!!! That's so original!!! 
Awesome!! 
great news! Look forward to working w/ "y'all" on that. Royitos on us! 
Just spoke here in #indy National Managers mtg. Talking and the work we're doing. Theme - CHANGE. 
Put together a little surprise this week for the "other" CMO, #AADigital 
Sport changed my life. We believe it can make a better world. Check me out in the new Nike spot  #nikebetterworld 
En route to Major Taylor's hometown. 
Orr amend fails! Thank you TX Reps. Pitts, Branch, Keffer & Hardcastle and advocates for your support of #txlege 
nice!! 
Shawshank Redemption 
Driving out to Lake Travis for a swim. Stop for a coffee and run into legendary drummer Chris Layton. Half of Double Trouble! 
possibly 
not a chance! 
tell them they are the key to the entire operation running smoothly. W/o nurses we're in trouble. I'm their #1 fan. 
Just rode a lap here at Rancho Pelota. Back in the day I'd call em "hot laps". #notanymore 
good luck my man! 
I have it on video from a few weeks ago. Unreal. 
no 
Big sleepover at the Armstrong house tonight - insanity. Only one thing can settle it down. Ferris Bueller's Day Off! 
Check out Chris Horner's Gran Fondo at www.cascadegranfondo.com (@ridethecascades) - will be a great event in Bend, Oregon this August! 
On a conf call w/ & other partners of Going over plans for Going 2 B great!! 
Perfect day in Austin, Texas. 5 mile run on Town Lake w/ 
Texans: please tell your State Reps to vote NO on the Orr budget amend. Strips $ from  #txlege 
Vacation's over. Back to being a full time driver for my kids. #lanceschauffeurservice 
Sebastian Rosseler wins final stage of 3 days of De Panne plus the overall. Congrats to him and everyone on 
Back in ATX. Great to be home! 
4 days in St Barths for The Bucket, 2 in the Abacos, finishing in Florida for the kick off of the tour. #ultimateboystrip 
my pleasure. Thank you for your service to our country. 
Modern Day Warrior!  
Hell. Yes.  
Congrats to the crew on the big seven-one!! 
tell that to the media. 
Who else is seeing in Ft Lauderdale tonight? Can't wait! 
Happy birthday 
Now following and These kids got game. 
Hanging w/ the pride of Mississippi.  
Hangin' w/ JB, Bart, , and crew here in St. Barths. 
thanks!! 
I am 
The man himself.  
At Baz Bar here in St Barths. None other than Jimmy Buffett rockin' a little impromptu gig. 
Happy birthday to and 
nice! Boats are rounding Le Toiny now. Quite the sight to see. 
Congratulations to for his TT victory in Criterium International today! on a roll. 
dude, c'mon down. racing in "the bucket" tomorrow. new experience.. 
didn't know but now I do. Thx for sharing. 
Early registration for the at Rancho Pelota is open!  
Heading to St Barths. Working on a cool side project. Love that island. 
really? 
I miss Norby for sure 
My buddy is down in Chile. Runs into another buddy of mine. At least he has the right hat on.  
Great mtg today w/ the team for too. Nice to hear that people are "re-investing" in their health and wellness. #prevention 
Thanks to everyone for coming out to the Navigation Center opening We are honored to be your partner. 
Got an advanced copy of the new Damn. Good. Better than that actually. #heavyrotation 
Program starts at 5pm. Come on down! 
Big day Opening our new navigation center designed to help austin's neediest thru the maze of a cancer diagnosis. 
class' wax museum presentation. He's Drew Brees! 
When's the Super Bowl? 
and thank you sir. Be safe. 
you bet! Thanks for being there. Be well. 
w/ NIH dir Dr Collins, Dr Seffrin, & fellow survivor Tracy Elliman. Appealing 4 no cuts in research funding!! 
nice! Royitos for everyone including CM! 
Just wrapped up an interview w/ from Was joined by Dr Seffrin from 
Leaving Great mtg w/ partners talking about global health and hoping to help save lives around the world. 
Great 5 mile run w/ the Old Guard over at Fort Myers. Thanks for having us. 
At Ft Myers about to run w/ some of the troops. Appreciate all their service and sacrifice. 
you bet! And thanks for all you have done as well. Let's connect soon. 
man, I'd love that! Unfortunately no bike, lots of mtgs, back to ATX tomorrow. Raincheck? 
Sorry for the multiple tweets. My bad. 
Just landed in DC and heading to to talk about Haiti and our nation's global investments in health. 
exactly zero. 
did tell 'em? 
Oops - 2 other TX restaurants made the list too. and Lots of talent in TX. Congrats! 
centipedes are far worse 
is up for a James Beard award- The Oscars of Food. Only place in TX to be nominated.  
Back in ATX sitting on the back porch, drinking an adult beverage, a cool breezy night, reading today's sports news. Twas a great day. 
no doubt. Need more like him. Happy bday Dave! 
Meet the Finalists from the ULTRA Reward on LS.  New videos all week highlighting time I spent with them. 
one of the best roads in central Texas 
Fellow survivor is now on twitter! 
I will! RT This Friday is our LIVESTRONG Cancer Navigation Center Grand Opening! Will you be here?  
That sucks 
Not as quiet as it is in here right now! 
How quiet is it in house right now? 
nice! 
Watching the Runnin' Horns w/ Hook 'em baby. 
you mean suffering/biking in Aspen? 
Dusted off the ol' bike and going for a ride in  
McConaughey is back. Just caught Lincoln Lawyer. Incredible. 
says one of the most innovative organizations in sports.  
RIP Elizabeth Mooneyham. We'll miss you meemaw. 
Made a video for Check it out.  
classic 
Tried out some new earbuds on the run too. Worked great. 
49 minute run 'done and dusted' as would say. 
My friend Tyson Cole from has his new cookbook out. check it out!  He even let me write the forward. 
Planning my trip to see Moving Pictures in its entirety! 
Please read this.  No matter what BT spends, they can't match our hustle, passion, & more importantly, THE FACTS. 
Meeting w/ going over and all the great things happening there. Sting or be stung! 
yes 
Happy St Patricks Day  
Just skinned up Snowmass w/ He absolutely schooled me. 
cool pics of show during  The Head and The Heart opening for Iron & Wine soon. 
who said they couldn't? 
If you haven't seen The Fighter yet then don't wait. Legit. Congrats to Scott Silver. 
My bud is now on twitter. Give him a follow! #go48! 
I did! 
30 min run here in in shorts and a tee! Off to skin up the mtn now. I'm getting addicted to this skinning business. 
thanks joe, can't wait. 
hey nice piece in today's  And thanks for your continued support of !! 
Wishing Bryan Robson a speedy recovery. #LIVESTRONG 
Watching 30 for 30's "Pony Express". 
Ahhh, sometimes the office view ain't so bad..  
cause before me they all wore surf shorts and tank tops? 
to my redneck brother! Retired life is beyond good. And yes, see y'all soon. 
to my redneck brother! Retired life is beyond good. And yes, see y'all soon. 
to my redneck brother! Retired life is beyond good. And yes, see y'all soon. 
"Skinned" up Buttermilk today. First time to do it - damn hard. 
me too 
I would if I wasn't in Colorado! 
Just went for a 53 and half minute run. 
one of the many reasons is the right thing to do. 
Happy birthday 
Great Saturday here in A little swim and even rode my bike outdoors. Town is packed. 
#13! RT hey boss not sure you've seen the new work to the banner its all in memory of my mom & g'ma  
#12! RT always livingstrong here too!  
#11! RT my girlfriend doesn't have a Twitter, but this is hers  
#10! RT Lost both parents to cancer. For them.  
#9 RT cmon Lance! Check mine out!  
#8! RT Yo, me too. It's on my fap hand as well. I'm surprised it hasn't disappeared.  
Tat #7! RT I can't wear the bands because of the rubber, I've had this for a while. Needs some touch up.  
Tat #6! RT This was first tat and after 5 more, this is still my favorite!  
Tat #5! RT my LS tatt sent as a Twitpic but u need only look at my avatar...03//17 is my 10//02! RT??? 
Tat #4! RT it's not the best but I love it!  
Damn, tat #3 tonight! RT can I get a rt for the pain  
2nd tat of the day! RT literally an hour old  
Watching the running Horns vs the Aggies in the Big 12 tourney. #hookem 
the armstrong/kelly/thornton posse awaits 
Sick!!! RT  
Best wishes go out to Kevin McDowell. Livestrong bud! 
Interesting piece n 2day's + survivors but not necessarily more success %wise. Lots of work left 2 do!  
Following the news from Japan. Our thoughts go out to everyone impacted by this terrible disaster. 
So proud of  
thanks man. 
6 min miles? Pretty solid dude. 
Just went for run. Forgot what exercise at 8000 ft feels like. Damn. 
never but will be all over #sxsw. 
anyone give lessons there? 
hmmmm, really? Who's job is it to police that for US? 
Heading up to the mtns for a bit. Bummed to miss SXSW - going to be incredible this year. Anyone visiting ATX, have fun! 

And how 'bout Kelly Slater? Why the hell aren't we reading more about this amazing athlete? 
hell yeah. Sup? 
Did ya know today is? 1. Intl Womens Day 2. Fat Tuesday 3. Tango night 
KC to ATX. One was 40 and rain, the other 82 and sunny. Great day for in both cities! 
Can a stadium impact the fight against cancer? www.livestrongsportingpark.com Tune in 1pm CST. #IamLSP 
no doubt about that. Just know we appreciate your service to our country. 
Now this is cool. Marfa anyone?  
Now this is cool. Marfa anyone?  
Dinner w/ and Birthplace of 
Just rode the greenbelt w/ She brought along that fella too. Perfect day in Austin. 
of the podium.. 
a lot of people have said that. will have the last word I'm pretty sure. 
sweeps it at West Flanders! Boo-ya! This kid is the real deal. 
My friend JR accepting his TED prize. So proud of him.  
Retirement consists of being a driver for my kids. Between school, sports, their friends, I'm just a high paid chauffeur. 
crushed it today in West Flanders!! Yes! Congrats #brightfuture 
you got a deal! 
could do. How's the weather? 
well said 
Got the latest from Iron and Wine playing too. It's great. 
Big ol' family dinner w/ and 
would be. Only half of that is a possibility now though. 
Great shoot with Mich Ultra today. Look forward to seeing the final outcome of the Ultra reward contest on livestrong.com in a coupla weeks. 
Hey please tell me this won't impact the  
It's California's turn to make history in the fight to end cancer  Please support #CCRA 
Thx to for making #LABikePlan a reality! 1,630miles of bike-friendly streets coming soon; can't wait2ride 'em during #cicLAvia 
barely 
nah, let em twist.. 
It was so long that it's actually spelled "lond". #oops. 
Lond day of meetings here in Portland at the Nike HQ. collection showing strong growth. Great team working on it. 
I knew i should have gone to college.  
Just got to Portland. What's up w/ this weather? 
yeah man, killer workout. Thanks for helping us out. You + = slight misery. Hats off to the Mayor 4 hangin 
In steering committee mtg for #CCRA w/ all the coalition partners. Great team! 
This year alone, more than 140,000 Californians will be diagnosed with cancer and 54,000 will die. #CCRA 
Just landed in LA 2 launch #CCRA w/ great partners like and Bold initiative 2 save lives 
Just ran 6 miles w/ 
Link to the JR feature...  
Check out the profile on JR in today's magazine. 
Snowing in LA? 
I've mixed it up - never been disappointed. Laid back and casual - best way. 
justines, mirabelle, chuys, hula hut, east side cafe. 
Dinner tonight new sister. Just as great. #tysondoesitagain 
Finally got around to watching Banksy's "Exit Through The Gift Shop". It was brilliant. 
just your ass? 
Hope everyone in town for the is having a helluva time. Gr8 days here in Austin.. 
I'm not. 
amen to that! 
Just left showing around the crew from Thanks to and Greg Lee for helping out. 
Long-time Staffer did a video for the Blog. Fashion show included.  
Yes!!! RT Congrats to Markel Irizar and the whole team for winning the Ruta del Sol! Very nice! 
Happy Birthday to Steve Jobs. 
eastside 
Date night w/ at Justine's. Never been before. Gotta say it was damn good and great service. Highly recommended. 
Congratulations to for the recent news!!! Good to be #1.  
Just ran (actually limped) a few miles w/ in the stroller. The little guy slept the whole time. What a life. 
no, what was it? 
Excellent dinner at Texas French Bread w/ and Love this place! BYOB/W! 
Reading the news regarding Angelo Mozilo. 
I'll be in Philly. 
Hanging out w/ my old buddy Talking and other things. Great to see him. 
Thoughts go out to the people of Christchurch, NZ after the massive earthquake yesterday. Wishing you all the best. 
Can barely walk today. 
either loosen your shoes or make sure there's enough padding on the tongue of your shoe. 
Bill Ramsdell is great. 
Watching Yo Gabba Gabba w/ Band of Horses are the musical guests. We're both happy. 
Headed to Rancho Pelota for and AG's wedding blowout. I hear is in the hood. Ruh roh. 
portland, austin, portland? #pap 
Fun times this am at the Austin Marathon. 20,000 runners!! Ran a 1:22. Gr8 to be w/ 
w/ She's trying to persuade me to run the half marathon w/ her and Alright, I'm in! 
Just went running w/ and Big day for Doug and Amy Grace!! 
alright, keep me posted on options. 

Trying to figure out my post strategy. Hmm. 
5 mile easy run w/ and Lots of runners in town for the Austin Marathon this wknd. 
happy birthday Linda. 
he did 
Dinner w/ at Surprise, surprise it kicked ass. 
amen to that 
Thanks for all the messages on retirement 2.0. And thanks for ALL the support the past 2.5 yrs. Onward! 
they have water too. 
Dinner tonight at Texas French Bread was amazing. 1st time there and glad we ventured out. BYOB too. Or BYOW in our case. 
Perfect evening in Austin, Texas. 
Can I get a 'hell ya' for the runnin' horns?!? 
no but still v day here in usa. Yo, I see you got some more followers. Right on. 
So cool to be constantly getting emails/tweets like re: the waffles. We're makin' 'em as fast as we can!! 
Hey did you know they named a street after you in New Jersey?!?  
At Topshop w/ twin 9 year olds. I need help. 
wide awake in the big apple. 
I do have one thing 
Arcade Fire! 
I dunno but he killed it tonight. 
What happens when you take your 11yr old son to a NASCAR race last fall? You get 2 take your 9yr old twin girls 2 the dog show. 
Congrats to on his win in Mumbai! Second victory of the season for 
walsh's lap dog? 
no doubt. Like his chances. 
I'll be there 
Classic - just got a shout out from the FOX crew. Thanks, guys. Yep, just chillin' at home watching the race. Go 48. 
go for it. 
About to watch the Daytona Budweiser Shootout. Feel like I need a masters degree to figure out this new #nascar structure though. #help! 
Just finished a 6 mile run w/ on a perfect Austin day. #nomorefreezesok? 
Happy birthday Mom !!! 
Or this?  
oh wow, I guess we're even now. 
wish him my best please. If can help then please let us know. 
Suerte 
I have my earplugs in. Go ahead. 
Dinner at Fonda San Miguel w/ and Love this place! 
Who's in?  
Ladies, has a new book coming out 3/1 called Mile Markers. Check it out! Thanks.  
$27,000 fixie.  
Check this out.  
now that is funny. 
I'm with you all on that. 
That's a big "IF" my friend... 
Honored to receive "Austinite of the Year" today. Also great to see so many great friends there. Thanks to you all. 
fly safe 
Congratulations on the win today!! 2011 starting off right for 
I miss Marfa, Texas. 
looking forward to it! 
Playing golf w/ my ol' bud Jeff Garvey at the legendary Lions Muni in Austin, Texas. 
all good man. I'm sorery for the response too. 
Had the pleasure of meeting Brian at the #LSAssembly. Perfect example of how to  #FightLikeHell 
Congrats to the Green Bay Packers. Great game. #turnoverskillyaeverytime 
that is badass! Thank you! 
Y'all wanna know who I'm picking? I can't! I'm torn!! Just glad it's (now) close. 
Got ourselves a game. 
no doubt about that, brother. Anyone who gives up everything to fight for our country is a "fucking" hero. 
Apple TV 
Please take a minute and check out www.pattillmanfoundation.org. 
I just watched "The Tillman Story". Speechless. True hero. Or as he would have said, true "fucking" hero. Please watch. 
we're jealous! 
Impressive!  
Just ran 6 miles pushing Yesterday woke up to 20 degress and snow. Ran today in shorts and 65 degrees. Crazy. 
Up for quarterly BoD mtg. 
Re-broadcast from last night's State of the Foundation now available at  
An amazing night . 400 advocates, healthcare professionals, survivors...All here for one purpose - changing the world! #lsassembly 
Congratulations to on an incredible career! 
Snow.  
Don't remember the last time I walked out to get the paper in the SNOW when I was in AUSTIN, TEXAS!!! #rare 
thx for sharing. Good luck w/ everything! 
Go to  now to watch the "LIVESTRONG State of the Foundation" Learn what we do 4 people affected by cancer. #LSAssembly 
Great meeting w/ the Nike Livestrong team. Things are rocking there! Thx to you all for the support. 
A BIG Texas welcome 2 all the advocates, mentors, grantees, supporters & program partners here in Austin for the 1st Assembly! 
and it's 24 degrees in Austin! Ouch. Btw, it very rarely gets that cold here. 
Back from vacaction. We had such a great time in Australia and New Zealand. Great places full of great people. Nice to be back in ATX tho!! 
Vacation time. . . 
Incredible turnout in #Brisbane 4 the Premiere of Queensland flood relief fund. Thx to the 1000's that turned up! Gr8 spirit down under! 
Oops I spelled "Brisvegas" wrong. Not enough sleep last night.. 
Brisbaine, here we come.. Adelaide, thanks again for everything! 
Up early heading to Royal Adelaide Hospital doing an event w/ amazing partners CANTEEN. They do great work. 
is done. Thanks to everyone for coming out and supporting such a great race. #Adelaide, we're gonna miss ya. 
Great night at the Legends dinner here in #Adelaide. 2200 amazing supporters of cycling! 
Just saw the trailer for Portlandia. Holy shit, that's some funny stuff. 
press officer hard(ly) at work.  
Thanks for supporting  
Wilunga broiught their "A" game today. Crowds were incredible. Thx to you all! 
Listening to some old Soulhat. One of Austin's best ever. 
Great to hear that is investigating some of claims. I look forward to being vindicated. 
Just started following He wants more followers than and 
Hey Brisbane, and I are bringing along your man for our little bike ride. We can't wait. 
the piece was spot on. 
Fun dinner w/ tonight at the Red Ochre. Lots of laughs and great Aussie food. Margie, we'll miss you! 
Good luck 2 those riding the Mutual Community Challenge Tour 2morrow  Go 2 www.rideforareason.com.au 2 learn more & help out 
Hey how 'bout a Twitter ride in Brisbane? 
Happy birthday to 
Quite a few crashes today too. Hope all the guys are ok. 
Tough st 2 and. 2nd on the stage and takes over the leaders jersey! Great work Robbie! 
Sad to hear about the passing of Sargent Shriver. He was a great man. 
Slept 10 hours. I was OUT! Looks like another beautiful day in #Adelaide. 
glad your back man 
Thinking about Steve Jobs. 
Gotta love reading the tweets from 
sunrise. Beers at sunset. 
St 1 done. Looks like got 2nd or 3rd so a good result for No racing for 5 months = suffering! 
Check out the app for your iPhone or iPad. 
Happy bday Ashleigh! RT Happy birthday to 's cycling mate Ashleigh Moore 
Up early here in OZ. Anti-doping blood control for the UCI. 
we're definitely stopping by one night. 
And a Happy Birthday to rider Gregory Rast! 31 yrs old!!  
Dinner out on the town w/ the fellas from Gotta love a plate of good morale. starts 2morrow. Come on out! 
At the park w/ and Absolutely perfect day in #Adelaide. 
Just left Flinders checking on the progress of the new Cancer Research Center w/ and Amb Bleich. Gr8 progress!! 
Dinner tonight with Ambassador Bleich, Peter Gago of Penfolds, and Pat Conlon. Talking a lot about this great country of Australia. 
Cancer Council Classic complete. came 3rd behind Goss and Good start for 
Relaxing in the room before kicks off w/ the Cancer Council Classic. Chris Whitley on the iPod. 
congrats! 
congrats! 
I couldn't agree more. And wattages too. Imagine here if fans were watching the sprints (and seeing the watts). 
eating w/ tonight. Thx for the offer tho. Raincheck. 
and got 103 million in return. 300%! We should all be so lucky to be victimized like that. Sign me up!! 
Was a real honor to spend time this morning with all the riders. Ashleigh smoked us! 
Thoughts are with James and Kylie Forbes and their family in Brisbane. Hope to see him in #Adelaide this week! 
Awesome twitter ride in #Adelaide! Thx to the 1000's who came 2 support the QLD flood relief. Gr8 2 see on the bike also! 
Sad to hear about the passing of Peter Post. He was an original. May he rest in peace. 
Great piece by Proud to be his friend and colleague.  
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
#Adelaide - don't forgot our appointment tomorrow 10am at Wigley Reserve, Glenelg. Me and all the fellas are psyched to ride w/ you all. 
